Ich bin.;I am.
Ich wäre nicht dort geblieben, hätte ich geahnt, dass die scheinbare Einigkeit nur eine fragile Illusion war.;I would not have stayed there had I suspected that the apparent unity was merely a fragile illusion.
Obwohl er vorgab, alles verstanden zu haben, offenbarte sein Zögern eine tiefe Unsicherheit.;Although he pretended to have understood everything, his hesitation revealed deep insecurity.
Je länger ich darüber nachdenke, desto deutlicher wird mir die Tragweite meiner Entscheidung.;The longer I reflect on it, the clearer the magnitude of my decision becomes.
Hätte sie sich nicht so vehement gewehrt, wäre der Ausgang vermutlich ein anderer gewesen.;Had she not resisted so vehemently, the outcome would likely have been different.
Was mich am meisten erstaunt, ist nicht der Fehler selbst, sondern die Konsequenz, mit der er ignoriert wurde.;What astonishes me most is not the mistake itself but the consistency with which it was ignored.
Indem er schwieg, stimmte er implizit allem zu, was später nicht mehr rückgängig zu machen war.;By remaining silent, he implicitly agreed to everything that could later no longer be undone.
Kaum hatte sie den Raum betreten, als sich die Atmosphäre spürbar veränderte.;No sooner had she entered the room than the atmosphere changed perceptibly.
Selbst wenn man alle Faktoren berücksichtigt, bleibt ein Rest an Ungewissheit bestehen.;Even if all factors are taken into account, a residue of uncertainty remains.
Er sprach, als habe er die Wahrheit gepachtet, obwohl seine Argumente brüchig waren.;He spoke as if he had a monopoly on the truth, although his arguments were fragile.
Nicht die Worte, sondern der unausgesprochene Subtext verlieh der Aussage ihr Gewicht.;It was not the words but the unspoken subtext that gave the statement its weight.
Dass sie gegangen war, ohne sich umzudrehen, sagte mehr als jede Erklärung.;The fact that she left without looking back said more than any explanation.
So überzeugend die Theorie auch klingt, an der Praxis scheitert sie regelmäßig.;As convincing as the theory may sound, it regularly fails in practice.
Er tat so, als wäre nichts geschehen, was die Situation nur weiter verschärfte.;He acted as if nothing had happened, which only exacerbated the situation.
Wäre die Information früher verfügbar gewesen, hätte man anders reagieren können.;Had the information been available earlier, one could have reacted differently.
Die Annahme, alles ließe sich kontrollieren, erwies sich als gefährlicher Irrtum.;The assumption that everything could be controlled proved to be a dangerous fallacy.
Indem sie Verantwortung übernahm, gewann sie mehr Respekt als durch jede Rechtfertigung.;By taking responsibility, she gained more respect than through any justification.
Was zunächst nebensächlich erschien, entpuppte sich als zentrales Element.;What initially seemed insignificant turned out to be a central element.
Er hätte es besser wissen müssen, doch die Bequemlichkeit überwog.;He should have known better, but convenience prevailed.
Ob man es nun zugibt oder nicht, die Entscheidung war längst gefallen.;Whether one admits it or not, the decision had long been made.
Die Art, wie er die Frage umging, war ebenso aufschlussreich wie die Antwort selbst.;The way he dodged the question was as revealing as the answer itself.
Sie war sich der Risiken bewusst, nahm sie jedoch billigend in Kauf.;She was aware of the risks but accepted them knowingly.
Erst im Rückblick erkennt man die subtilen Warnsignale.;Only in hindsight does one recognize the subtle warning signs.
Was als Kompromiss gedacht war, wurde schnell zur Belastung.;What was intended as a compromise quickly became a burden.
Indem er die Verantwortung delegierte, entzog er sich ihr zugleich.;By delegating responsibility, he simultaneously evaded it.
So sehr sie sich bemühte, konnte sie den Eindruck nicht entkräften.;No matter how hard she tried, she could not dispel the impression.
Die Tatsache, dass niemand widersprach, machte die Aussage nicht wahrer.;The fact that no one objected did not make the statement any truer.
Hätte man genauer hingesehen, wären die Konsequenzen absehbar gewesen.;Had one looked more closely, the consequences would have been foreseeable.
Er verlor sich in Details und verfehlte dabei das Wesentliche.;He got lost in details and thereby missed the essential point.
Was unausgesprochen blieb, wog schwerer als das Gesagte.;What remained unsaid carried more weight than what was said.
Sie reagierte gelassener, als man es von ihr erwartet hätte.;She reacted more calmly than one would have expected from her.
Die Diskussion kreiste, ohne je zu einem Ergebnis zu gelangen.;The discussion went in circles without ever reaching a conclusion.
Indem man Schuld zuwies, vermied man die eigentliche Problemlösung.;By assigning blame, the actual problem-solving was avoided.
Es war weniger ein Fehler als vielmehr ein systemisches Versagen.;It was less a mistake than a systemic failure.
So nachvollziehbar seine Beweggründe waren, so problematisch war das Resultat.;As understandable as his motives were, the result was problematic.
Er hatte sich verrannt und erkannte es zu spät.;He had gone astray and realized it too late.
Dass sie schwieg, bedeutete keineswegs Zustimmung.;Her silence by no means implied consent.
Die Hoffnung, es würde sich von selbst lösen, erwies sich als trügerisch.;The hope that it would resolve itself proved deceptive.
Er formulierte vorsichtig, um keine Angriffsfläche zu bieten.;He worded his statement carefully to offer no point of attack.
Was wie Mut aussah, war in Wahrheit Verzweiflung.;What looked like courage was in truth desperation.
Sie stellte die richtigen Fragen, auch wenn die Antworten unangenehm waren.;She asked the right questions, even if the answers were uncomfortable.
Je mehr er erklärte, desto unglaubwürdiger wirkte er.;The more he explained, the less credible he appeared.
Man kann nicht alles rechtfertigen, nur weil es üblich ist.;One cannot justify everything merely because it is customary.
Indem sie die Perspektive wechselte, eröffnete sie neue Möglichkeiten.;By changing perspective, she opened up new possibilities.
Die Konsequenzen wurden unterschätzt, obwohl sie absehbar waren.;The consequences were underestimated, although they were foreseeable.
Er bestand darauf, obwohl die Fakten dagegen sprachen.;He insisted despite the facts speaking against it.
Nicht selten erweist sich Geduld als wirksamste Strategie.;Patience often proves to be the most effective strategy.
Sie ließ keinen Zweifel daran, dass sie die Entscheidung bereute.;She left no doubt that she regretted the decision.
Was er als Ehrlichkeit verstand, wurde als Taktlosigkeit empfunden.;What he considered honesty was perceived as tactlessness.
Er hätte eingreifen können, entschied sich jedoch dagegen.;He could have intervened but chose not to.
Die Diskussion gewann an Schärfe, je persönlicher sie wurde.;The discussion grew sharper the more personal it became.
Indem man Komplexität reduziert, verliert man oft Genauigkeit.;By reducing complexity, one often loses precision.
Sie erkannte zu spät, dass Vertrauen missbraucht worden war.;She realized too late that trust had been abused.
So sehr man es auch drehen mag, die Verantwortung bleibt.;No matter how one spins it, the responsibility remains.
Er argumentierte logisch, übersah jedoch den menschlichen Faktor.;He argued logically but overlooked the human factor.
Was einst selbstverständlich war, steht nun zur Disposition.;What was once taken for granted is now up for debate.
Sie sprach leise, doch ihre Worte hatten Nachhall.;She spoke softly, yet her words resonated.
Der Versuch, es allen recht zu machen, scheiterte zwangsläufig.;The attempt to please everyone inevitably failed.
Er nahm Kritik persönlich, anstatt sie konstruktiv zu nutzen.;He took criticism personally instead of using it constructively.
Indem sie Grenzen setzte, schuf sie Klarheit.;By setting boundaries, she created clarity.
Die Erkenntnis kam schleichend, aber unumkehrbar.;The realization came gradually but irreversibly.
Was gut gemeint war, hatte unerwünschte Nebenwirkungen.;What was well-intentioned had unintended side effects.
Er war sich sicher, doch diese Sicherheit trog.;He was certain, but that certainty was misleading.
Nicht alles, was legal ist, ist auch legitim.;Not everything that is legal is also legitimate.
Sie akzeptierte den Ausgang, ohne ihn gutzuheißen.;She accepted the outcome without endorsing it.
Je stärker der Druck wurde, desto größer war der Widerstand.;The greater the pressure became, the stronger the resistance grew.
Er unterschätzte die Langzeitfolgen seiner Entscheidung.;He underestimated the long-term consequences of his decision.
Indem man Fragen stellt, stellt man Gewissheiten infrage.;By asking questions, one challenges certainties.
Die Situation erforderte Fingerspitzengefühl, nicht Härte.;The situation required tact, not harshness.
Was zunächst eindeutig schien, erwies sich als vielschichtig.;What initially seemed clear-cut turned out to be complex.
Er wich aus, wo Klarheit nötig gewesen wäre.;He evaded where clarity would have been necessary.
Sie gewann Abstand und damit einen klareren Blick.;She gained distance and with it a clearer view.
Der Preis für die Entscheidung war höher als erwartet.;The price for the decision was higher than expected.
Indem man zuhört, versteht man mehr als durch Reden.;By listening, one understands more than by speaking.
Er hielt an Prinzipien fest, auch als es unpopulär wurde.;He stuck to principles even when it became unpopular.
Was verschoben wurde, wurde nie wirklich gelöst.;What was postponed was never truly resolved.
Sie ließ sich nicht provozieren, obwohl es versucht wurde.;She did not allow herself to be provoked, although attempts were made.
Die Argumentation war schlüssig, aber nicht überzeugend.;The argumentation was coherent but not persuasive.
Er erkannte den Fehler an, ohne Ausflüchte zu suchen.;He acknowledged the mistake without making excuses.
Je mehr Zeit verging, desto schwieriger wurde eine Korrektur.;The more time passed, the more difficult a correction became.
Indem sie Verantwortung ablehnte, verlor sie Glaubwürdigkeit.;By rejecting responsibility, she lost credibility.
Was unausweichlich war, wurde unnötig hinausgezögert.;What was inevitable was unnecessarily delayed.
Er sprach von Freiheit, meinte aber Kontrolle.;He spoke of freedom but meant control.
Sie ließ Raum für Zweifel, wo andere Gewissheit forderten.;She allowed room for doubt where others demanded certainty.
Die Entscheidung fiel unter Druck und ohne ausreichende Abwägung.;The decision was made under pressure and without sufficient consideration.
Indem man Fehler zugibt, gewinnt man Vertrauen zurück.;By admitting mistakes, one regains trust.
Was als Ausnahme begann, wurde zur Regel.;What began as an exception became the rule.
Er ignorierte Einwände, bis sie nicht mehr zu übersehen waren.;He ignored objections until they could no longer be overlooked.
Sie stellte Zusammenhänge her, die anderen entgangen waren.;She made connections that others had missed.
Der Konflikt war nicht neu, nur lange verdrängt.;The conflict was not new, merely long suppressed.
Indem man Vereinfachungen wählt, riskiert man Verzerrungen.;By choosing simplifications, one risks distortions.
Er verlor die Kontrolle, während er sie zu behalten glaubte.;He lost control while believing he was maintaining it.
Sie sprach aus, was andere nur dachten.;She articulated what others only thought.
Die Konsequenzen waren gravierender, als man angenommen hatte.;The consequences were more severe than had been assumed.
Indem man Verantwortung teilt, entzieht man sich ihr nicht.;By sharing responsibility, one does not evade it.
Er suchte Bestätigung statt Wahrheit.;He sought confirmation rather than truth.
Was als Fortschritt verkauft wurde, war ein Rückschritt.;What was sold as progress was a step backward.
Sie akzeptierte die Unsicherheit als Teil des Prozesses.;She accepted uncertainty as part of the process.
Je klarer die Fakten wurden, desto brüchiger die Ausreden.;The clearer the facts became, the more fragile the excuses were.
Er erkannte zu spät, dass Schweigen auch eine Entscheidung ist.;He realized too late that silence is also a decision.
Hätte ich es gewusst, hätte ich anders gehandelt.;Had I known, I would have acted differently.
So einfach, wie es scheint, ist es nicht.;It is not as simple as it seems.
Er hätte widersprechen sollen, tat es aber nicht.;He should have objected, but he did not.
Was gesagt wurde, blieb bewusst vage.;What was said remained deliberately vague.
Sie nahm es hin, ohne es zu akzeptieren.;She accepted it without approving it.
Je mehr man erklärt, desto weniger überzeugt man.;The more one explains, the less one convinces.
Das Ergebnis entsprach nicht den Erwartungen.;The result did not meet expectations.
Er schwieg, obwohl Klarheit nötig gewesen wäre.;He remained silent although clarity was needed.
Was selbstverständlich schien, war es nicht.;What seemed self-evident was not.
Sie hätte es verhindern können.;She could have prevented it.
Die Entscheidung fiel unter Zeitdruck.;The decision was made under time pressure.
Er wirkte sicherer, als er war.;He appeared more confident than he was.
Nicht alles lässt sich begründen.;Not everything can be justified.
Sie ließ Zweifel bewusst zu.;She deliberately allowed doubt.
Der Versuch scheiterte kläglich.;The attempt failed miserably.
Er erkannte den Widerspruch sofort.;He recognized the contradiction immediately.
Was offenblieb, wog schwer.;What remained unresolved carried weight.
Sie zog sich kommentarlos zurück.;She withdrew without comment.
Die Kritik war berechtigt.;The criticism was justified.
Er hatte es kommen sehen.;He had seen it coming.
So überzeugend das Argument war, es reichte nicht.;Convincing as the argument was, it was not enough.
Sie widersprach, ohne laut zu werden.;She disagreed without raising her voice.
Der Kontext wurde ignoriert.;The context was ignored.
Er hätte genauer hinschauen müssen.;He should have looked more closely.
Was fehlte, war Konsequenz.;What was missing was consistency.
Sie handelte aus Pflichtgefühl.;She acted out of a sense of duty.
Die Aussage ließ Spielraum.;The statement left room for interpretation.
Er blieb absichtlich unkonkret.;He remained deliberately vague.
Das Problem war struktureller Natur.;The problem was structural in nature.
Sie zeigte sich einsichtig.;She showed understanding.
Was entschieden wurde, war unumkehrbar.;What was decided was irreversible.
Er nahm Abstand von seiner Position.;He distanced himself from his position.
Die Begründung war unzureichend.;The justification was insufficient.
Sie erkannte die Tragweite.;She recognized the magnitude.
Der Einwand kam zu spät.;The objection came too late.
Er sprach, ohne etwas zu sagen.;He spoke without saying anything.
Was erwartet wurde, trat nicht ein.;What was expected did not occur.
Sie stellte keine weiteren Fragen.;She asked no further questions.
Die Situation blieb angespannt.;The situation remained tense.
Er ließ sich nicht beirren.;He was not swayed.
Was notwendig gewesen wäre, unterblieb.;What would have been necessary did not happen.
Sie zeigte Haltung.;She showed integrity.
Der Kompromiss war fragil.;The compromise was fragile.
Er wich der Verantwortung aus.;He evaded responsibility.
Was richtig war, blieb umstritten.;What was right remained disputed.
Sie akzeptierte die Entscheidung.;She accepted the decision.
Die Annahme erwies sich als falsch.;The assumption proved false.
Er blieb bei seiner Einschätzung.;He stuck to his assessment.
Was gesagt wurde, hatte Folgen.;What was said had consequences.
Sie verlor das Vertrauen.;She lost trust.
Die Erklärung kam ungelegen.;The explanation came at an inconvenient time.
Er handelte überlegt.;He acted thoughtfully.
Was möglich schien, war unrealistisch.;What seemed possible was unrealistic.
Sie reagierte zurückhaltend.;She reacted cautiously.
Der Zweifel blieb bestehen.;The doubt persisted.
Er ließ die Gelegenheit verstreichen.;He let the opportunity pass.
Was beabsichtigt war, misslang.;What was intended failed.
Sie blieb sachlich.;She remained factual.
Die Konsequenz war absehbar.;The consequence was foreseeable.
Er zeigte Einsicht.;He showed insight.
Was vereinbart war, wurde gebrochen.;What was agreed upon was broken.
Sie stellte Bedingungen.;She set conditions.
Der Ansatz war gut gemeint.;The approach was well-intentioned.
Er verlor an Glaubwürdigkeit.;He lost credibility.
Was fehlte, war Mut.;What was missing was courage.
Sie ließ sich Zeit.;She took her time.
Die Reaktion fiel verhalten aus.;The reaction was restrained.
Er erkannte den Fehler.;He recognized the mistake.
Was offenstand, wurde vertagt.;What was unresolved was postponed.
Sie blieb konsequent.;She remained consistent.
Die Lage spitzte sich zu.;The situation escalated.
Er zog seine Zusage zurück.;He withdrew his commitment.
Was plausibel klang, täuschte.;What sounded plausible was deceptive.
Sie blieb unbeeinflusst.;She remained unaffected.
Der Konflikt schwälte weiter.;The conflict continued to simmer.
Er vermied klare Aussagen.;He avoided clear statements.
Was gesagt werden musste, blieb unausgesprochen.;What needed to be said remained unsaid.
Sie zeigte Zurückhaltung.;She showed restraint.
Die Entscheidung wirkte überstürzt.;The decision seemed rushed.
Er rechtfertigte sich nicht.;He did not justify himself.
Was als Lösung galt, war keine.;What was considered a solution was not one.
Sie erkannte den Zusammenhang.;She recognized the connection.
Der Ton verschärfte sich.;The tone hardened.
Er blieb standhaft.;He remained firm.
Was zunächst half, schadete später.;What initially helped later caused harm.
Sie übernahm Verantwortung.;She took responsibility.
Die Einschätzung war voreilig.;The assessment was premature.
Er stellte sich quer.;He opposed it.
Was selbstverständlich wirkte, war erlernt.;What seemed natural was learned.
Sie hielt Abstand.;She kept her distance.
Die Erklärung überzeugte nicht.;The explanation was unconvincing.
Er nahm Kritik an.;He accepted criticism.
Was geplant war, wurde geändert.;What was planned was changed.
Sie blieb ruhig.;She remained calm.
Der Druck nahm zu.;The pressure increased.
Er unterschätzte den Aufwand.;He underestimated the effort.
Was eindeutig schien, war es nicht.;What seemed clear was not.
Sie zog Konsequenzen.;She drew conclusions.
Die Diskussion verlief im Kreis.;The discussion went in circles.
Er blieb skeptisch.;He remained skeptical.
Was versprochen wurde, fehlte.;What was promised was missing.
Sie zeigte Verständnis.;She showed understanding.
Der Einwand war berechtigt.;The objection was justified.
Er änderte seine Meinung.;He changed his mind.
Wiewohl die detailliert ausgearbeitete Reformvorlage in juristischer Hinsicht nahezu unangreifbar schien, regte sich im politisch aufgeheizten Umfeld unerwartet heftiger Widerstand.;Although the elaborately drafted reform proposal seemed almost unassailable from a legal standpoint, unexpectedly strong resistance arose in the politically heated environment.
Alldieweil die wirtschaftlichen Rahmenbedingungen sich zunehmend destabilisierten, sah sich die verantwortliche Regierung zu drastischen Sparmaßnahmen gezwungen.;Since the economic conditions increasingly destabilized, the responsible government felt compelled to adopt drastic austerity measures.
Kraft ausdrücklicher vertraglicher Vereinbarungen war die internationale Organisation befugt, eigenständige Kontrollmechanismen zu etablieren.;By virtue of explicit contractual agreements, the international organization was authorized to establish independent control mechanisms.
Vermittels einer subtil abgestimmten, diplomatisch sensiblen Verhandlungsstrategie gelang es dem erfahrenen Unterhändler, die verhärteten Fronten vorsichtig aufzuweichen.;By means of a subtly coordinated, diplomatically sensitive negotiation strategy, the experienced negotiator succeeded in cautiously softening the entrenched positions.
Unbeschadet der berechtigten Einwände kritischer Fachkollegen hielt der renommierte Professor unbeirrt an seiner provokanten These fest.;Notwithstanding the justified objections of critical colleagues, the renowned professor steadfastly adhered to his provocative thesis.
Eingedenk der historischen Tragweite dieser folgenschweren Entscheidung formulierte das Gremium seine Stellungnahme ungewöhnlich zurückhaltend.;Mindful of the historical significance of this consequential decision, the committee formulated its statement in an unusually restrained manner.
Aus sicherheitstechnischen Gründen halber wurde die ursprünglich öffentlich geplante Konferenz kurzfristig in einen geschützten Rahmen verlegt.;For security reasons, the originally public conference was relocated at short notice to a protected setting.
Dieweil die komplexen Abstimmungsprozesse sich unerwartet verzögerten, geriet der ambitionierte Zeitplan zunehmend ins Wanken.;While the complex coordination processes were unexpectedly delayed, the ambitious schedule increasingly began to falter.
Indes blieb die grundlegende Problematik trotz intensiver Beratungen weitgehend ungelöst bestehen.;Meanwhile, the fundamental problem largely remained unresolved despite intensive consultations.
Mitnichten könne man behaupten, die kontrovers diskutierte Maßnahme sei alternativlos gewesen.;By no means could one claim that the controversially discussed measure had been without alternative.
Schlechterdings unverständlich erschien es der kritischen Öffentlichkeit, weshalb die transparente Kommunikation so lange unterblieben war.;It appeared absolutely incomprehensible to the critical public why transparent communication had been delayed for so long.
Gleichwohl erkannte man in der differenzierten Argumentation einen ernsthaften Versuch konstruktiver Problemlösung.;Nevertheless, one recognized in the differentiated argumentation a serious attempt at constructive problem-solving.
Das hätte man doch wohl deutlich präziser und weniger missverständlich formulieren können.;That could surely have been formulated much more precisely and less ambiguously.
Sei es, dass strukturelle Defizite vorlagen, sei es, dass individuelle Fehlentscheidungen getroffen wurden, die Ursachen blieben vielschichtig.;Whether structural deficits existed or individual misjudgments were made, the causes remained multifaceted.
Man bedenke nur, wie gravierend die langfristigen sozioökonomischen Konsequenzen dieser weitreichenden Reform sein könnten.;One should only consider how serious the long-term socioeconomic consequences of this far-reaching reform might be.
Zu prüfen wäre ferner, ob die institutionellen Kontrollinstanzen ihrer Verantwortung hinreichend gerecht geworden sind.;It would furthermore be necessary to examine whether the institutional control bodies have adequately fulfilled their responsibility.
So nachhaltig wirkte die eindringliche Warnung des erfahrenen Experten, dass selbst überzeugte Befürworter ins Zweifeln gerieten.;So lasting was the experienced expert’s urgent warning that even convinced supporters began to doubt.
Kaum war die umfassende Gesetzesnovelle verabschiedet worden, da wurden bereits erste verfassungsrechtliche Bedenken laut.;Hardly had the comprehensive legislative amendment been passed when the first constitutional concerns were voiced.
Wenngleich der literarisch anspruchsvolle Essay bewusst mit mehrdeutigen Metaphern operierte, ließ sich seine zentrale Botschaft bei sorgfältiger Lektüre klar erkennen.;Although the literarily sophisticated essay deliberately employed ambiguous metaphors, its central message could be clearly discerned upon careful reading.
Alldieweil die internationale Lage zunehmend instabil erschien, erwiesen sich die vorsichtig kalkulierten Prognosen als bemerkenswert realistisch.;Since the international situation appeared increasingly unstable, the cautiously calculated forecasts proved remarkably realistic.
Kraft richterlicher Anordnung wurde die umstrittene Entscheidung vorläufig außer Vollzug gesetzt.;By virtue of a judicial order, the controversial decision was provisionally suspended.
Vermittels gezielt eingesetzter rhetorischer Stilmittel gelang es der charismatischen Rednerin, das heterogene Publikum nachhaltig zu beeindrucken.;By means of deliberately employed rhetorical devices, the charismatic speaker succeeded in impressing the heterogeneous audience in a lasting way.
Unbeschadet einzelner formaler Mängel blieb die grundlegende Argumentationslinie stringent und überzeugend.;Notwithstanding individual formal deficiencies, the fundamental line of argument remained coherent and persuasive.
Indessen zeigte sich im weiteren Verlauf der Debatte, dass die Positionen kaum noch miteinander vereinbar waren.;Meanwhile, it became apparent in the further course of the debate that the positions were hardly compatible anymore.
Mitnichten war die scheinbar pragmatische Lösung so alternativlos, wie ihre Befürworter beharrlich behaupteten.;By no means was the seemingly pragmatic solution as without alternative as its supporters persistently claimed.
Schlechterdings ausgeschlossen sei es, so der erfahrene Kommentator, die komplexe Problematik auf eine einzige Ursache zu reduzieren.;It was absolutely out of the question, according to the experienced commentator, to reduce the complex issue to a single cause.
Gleichwohl blieb die vorsichtig formulierte Kritik innerhalb des institutionellen Rahmens sachlich und konstruktiv.;Nevertheless, the cautiously formulated criticism remained objective and constructive within the institutional framework.
Das ist ja nun wirklich keine tragfähige, langfristig durchdachte Perspektive, entgegnete der nüchterne Analyst trocken.;That truly is not a sustainable, long-term perspective, the sober analyst replied dryly.
Sei dem, wie ihm wolle, die weitreichenden Konsequenzen dieser grundlegenden Entscheidung werden die politische Landschaft nachhaltig prägen.;Be that as it may, the far-reaching consequences of this fundamental decision will shape the political landscape in a lasting way.
So komplex gestaltete sich die vielschichtige Sachlage, dass selbst erfahrene Experten nur vorsichtige Prognosen zu wagen vermochten.;So complex did the multifaceted situation prove that even experienced experts were able to venture only cautious forecasts.
Wiewohl die detailliert ausgearbeitete Reformvorlage in juristischer Hinsicht nahezu unangreifbar schien, regte sich im politisch aufgeheizten Umfeld unerwartet heftiger Widerstand.;Although the elaborately drafted reform proposal seemed almost unassailable from a legal standpoint, unexpectedly strong resistance arose in the politically heated environment.
Alldieweil die wirtschaftlichen Rahmenbedingungen sich zunehmend destabilisierten, sah sich die verantwortliche Regierung zu drastischen Sparmaßnahmen gezwungen.;Since the economic conditions increasingly destabilized, the responsible government felt compelled to adopt drastic austerity measures.
Kraft ausdrücklicher vertraglicher Vereinbarungen war die internationale Organisation befugt, eigenständige Kontrollmechanismen zu etablieren.;By virtue of explicit contractual agreements, the international organization was authorized to establish independent control mechanisms.
Vermittels einer subtil abgestimmten, diplomatisch sensiblen Verhandlungsstrategie gelang es dem erfahrenen Unterhändler, die verhärteten Fronten vorsichtig aufzuweichen.;By means of a subtly coordinated, diplomatically sensitive negotiation strategy, the experienced negotiator succeeded in cautiously softening the entrenched positions.
Unbeschadet der berechtigten Einwände kritischer Fachkollegen hielt der renommierte Professor unbeirrt an seiner provokanten These fest.;Notwithstanding the justified objections of critical colleagues, the renowned professor steadfastly adhered to his provocative thesis.
Eingedenk der historischen Tragweite dieser folgenschweren Entscheidung formulierte das Gremium seine Stellungnahme ungewöhnlich zurückhaltend.;Mindful of the historical significance of this consequential decision, the committee formulated its statement in an unusually restrained manner.
Aus sicherheitstechnischen Gründen halber wurde die ursprünglich öffentlich geplante Konferenz kurzfristig in einen geschützten Rahmen verlegt.;For security reasons, the originally public conference was relocated at short notice to a protected setting.
Dieweil die komplexen Abstimmungsprozesse sich unerwartet verzögerten, geriet der ambitionierte Zeitplan zunehmend ins Wanken.;While the complex coordination processes were unexpectedly delayed, the ambitious schedule increasingly began to falter.
Indes blieb die grundlegende Problematik trotz intensiver Beratungen weitgehend ungelöst bestehen.;Meanwhile, the fundamental problem largely remained unresolved despite intensive consultations.
Mitnichten könne man behaupten, die kontrovers diskutierte Maßnahme sei alternativlos gewesen.;By no means could one claim that the controversially discussed measure had been without alternative.
Schlechterdings unverständlich erschien es der kritischen Öffentlichkeit, weshalb die transparente Kommunikation so lange unterblieben war.;It appeared absolutely incomprehensible to the critical public why transparent communication had been delayed for so long.
Gleichwohl erkannte man in der differenzierten Argumentation einen ernsthaften Versuch konstruktiver Problemlösung.;Nevertheless, one recognized in the differentiated argumentation a serious attempt at constructive problem-solving.
Das hätte man doch wohl deutlich präziser und weniger missverständlich formulieren können.;That could surely have been formulated much more precisely and less ambiguously.
Sei es, dass strukturelle Defizite vorlagen, sei es, dass individuelle Fehlentscheidungen getroffen wurden, die Ursachen blieben vielschichtig.;Whether structural deficits existed or individual misjudgments were made, the causes remained multifaceted.
Man bedenke nur, wie gravierend die langfristigen sozioökonomischen Konsequenzen dieser weitreichenden Reform sein könnten.;One should only consider how serious the long-term socioeconomic consequences of this far-reaching reform might be.
Zu prüfen wäre ferner, ob die institutionellen Kontrollinstanzen ihrer Verantwortung hinreichend gerecht geworden sind.;It would furthermore be necessary to examine whether the institutional control bodies have adequately fulfilled their responsibility.
So nachhaltig wirkte die eindringliche Warnung des erfahrenen Experten, dass selbst überzeugte Befürworter ins Zweifeln gerieten.;So lasting was the experienced expert’s urgent warning that even convinced supporters began to doubt.
Kaum war die umfassende Gesetzesnovelle verabschiedet worden, da wurden bereits erste verfassungsrechtliche Bedenken laut.;Hardly had the comprehensive legislative amendment been passed when the first constitutional concerns were voiced.
Wenngleich der literarisch anspruchsvolle Essay bewusst mit mehrdeutigen Metaphern operierte, ließ sich seine zentrale Botschaft bei sorgfältiger Lektüre klar erkennen.;Although the literarily sophisticated essay deliberately employed ambiguous metaphors, its central message could be clearly discerned upon careful reading.
Alldieweil die internationale Lage zunehmend instabil erschien, erwiesen sich die vorsichtig kalkulierten Prognosen als bemerkenswert realistisch.;Since the international situation appeared increasingly unstable, the cautiously calculated forecasts proved remarkably realistic.
Kraft richterlicher Anordnung wurde die umstrittene Entscheidung vorläufig außer Vollzug gesetzt.;By virtue of a judicial order, the controversial decision was provisionally suspended.
Vermittels gezielt eingesetzter rhetorischer Stilmittel gelang es der charismatischen Rednerin, das heterogene Publikum nachhaltig zu beeindrucken.;By means of deliberately employed rhetorical devices, the charismatic speaker succeeded in impressing the heterogeneous audience in a lasting way.
Unbeschadet einzelner formaler Mängel blieb die grundlegende Argumentationslinie stringent und überzeugend.;Notwithstanding individual formal deficiencies, the fundamental line of argument remained coherent and persuasive.
Indessen zeigte sich im weiteren Verlauf der Debatte, dass die Positionen kaum noch miteinander vereinbar waren.;Meanwhile, it became apparent in the further course of the debate that the positions were hardly compatible anymore.
Mitnichten war die scheinbar pragmatische Lösung so alternativlos, wie ihre Befürworter beharrlich behaupteten.;By no means was the seemingly pragmatic solution as without alternative as its supporters persistently claimed.
Schlechterdings ausgeschlossen sei es, so der erfahrene Kommentator, die komplexe Problematik auf eine einzige Ursache zu reduzieren.;It was absolutely out of the question, according to the experienced commentator, to reduce the complex issue to a single cause.
Gleichwohl blieb die vorsichtig formulierte Kritik innerhalb des institutionellen Rahmens sachlich und konstruktiv.;Nevertheless, the cautiously formulated criticism remained objective and constructive within the institutional framework.
Das ist ja nun wirklich keine tragfähige, langfristig durchdachte Perspektive, entgegnete der nüchterne Analyst trocken.;That truly is not a sustainable, long-term perspective, the sober analyst replied dryly.
Sei dem, wie ihm wolle, die weitreichenden Konsequenzen dieser grundlegenden Entscheidung werden die politische Landschaft nachhaltig prägen.;Be that as it may, the far-reaching consequences of this fundamental decision will shape the political landscape in a lasting way.
So komplex gestaltete sich die vielschichtige Sachlage, dass selbst erfahrene Experten nur vorsichtige Prognosen zu wagen vermochten.;So complex did the multifaceted situation prove that even experienced experts were able to venture only cautious forecasts.
Wiewohl die ambitionierte Reforminitiative in der öffentlichen Wahrnehmung zunächst enthusiastisch begrüßt wurde, offenbarte sich bei näherer juristischer Prüfung ihre strukturelle Fragilität.;Although the ambitious reform initiative was initially welcomed enthusiastically in public perception, its structural fragility became apparent upon closer legal examination.
Alldieweil die fiskalischen Spielräume zunehmend schrumpften, sah sich die verantwortliche Koalition zu unpopulären, jedoch unausweichlichen Konsolidierungsmaßnahmen veranlasst.;Since the fiscal leeway increasingly diminished, the responsible coalition felt compelled to adopt unpopular yet unavoidable consolidation measures.
Kraft ministerieller Weisung wurde die bislang autonome Behörde einer umfassenden administrativen Neuordnung unterzogen.;By virtue of a ministerial directive, the previously autonomous authority was subjected to a comprehensive administrative restructuring.
Vermittels einer technologisch hochentwickelten, algorithmisch gesteuerten Analyseplattform konnten bislang verborgene systemische Risiken frühzeitig identifiziert werden.;By means of a technologically advanced, algorithmically controlled analysis platform, previously hidden systemic risks could be identified at an early stage.
Unbeschadet parteipolitischer Differenzen verständigten sich die Verhandlungspartner auf einen vorläufigen, jedoch tragfähigen Kompromiss.;Notwithstanding party-political differences, the negotiating parties agreed on a provisional yet viable compromise.
Eingedenk der sensiblen geopolitischen Lage formulierte die diplomatische Delegation ihre Stellungnahme bewusst vage und strategisch zurückhaltend.;Mindful of the sensitive geopolitical situation, the diplomatic delegation deliberately formulated its statement in a vague and strategically restrained manner.
Aus datenschutzrechtlichen Gründen halber wurden sämtliche personenbezogenen Informationen konsequent anonymisiert und verschlüsselt gespeichert.;For data protection reasons, all personal information was consistently anonymized and stored in encrypted form.
Dieweil die internen Abstimmungsprozesse sich als unerwartet komplex erwiesen, verzögerte sich die Implementierung der digitalen Infrastruktur erheblich.;While the internal coordination processes proved unexpectedly complex, the implementation of the digital infrastructure was considerably delayed.
Indes zeigte sich in der vertieften Analyse, dass die vermeintlich eindeutigen Indikatoren durchaus ambivalent interpretiert werden konnten.;Meanwhile, deeper analysis revealed that the supposedly clear indicators could indeed be interpreted ambiguously.
Mitnichten dürfe man die langfristigen sozialen Verwerfungen unterschätzen, warnte der erfahrene Soziologe eindringlich.;By no means should one underestimate the long-term social disruptions, the experienced sociologist warned emphatically.
Schlechterdings unannehmbar erschien dem internationalen Beobachter die offenkundig selektive Anwendung rechtlicher Maßstäbe.;The evidently selective application of legal standards appeared absolutely unacceptable to the international observer.
Gleichwohl blieb die institutionelle Stabilität trotz der eskalierenden Konfliktdynamik überraschend gewahrt.;Nevertheless, institutional stability remained surprisingly intact despite the escalating conflict dynamics.
Das hätte man doch durchaus transparenter und weniger bürokratisch kompliziert gestalten können, merkte der pragmatische Berater an.;That could certainly have been made more transparent and less bureaucratically complicated, the pragmatic advisor remarked.
Sei es, dass ökonomische Eigeninteressen dominierten, sei es, dass ideologische Überzeugungen überwogen, die Entscheidungsgrundlagen blieben intransparent.;Whether economic self-interests dominated or ideological convictions prevailed, the basis of the decision remained opaque.
Man unterschätze ja nicht die symbolische Wirkung solch öffentlichkeitswirksamer Maßnahmen.;One should not underestimate the symbolic impact of such publicity-effective measures.
Zu hinterfragen wäre indessen, ob die normative Legitimation der Maßnahme hinreichend begründet worden ist.;It would meanwhile be worth questioning whether the normative legitimation of the measure has been sufficiently justified.
So gravierend waren die strukturellen Defizite innerhalb der komplexen Verwaltungsarchitektur, dass eine schrittweise Reform als unzureichend erschien.;So serious were the structural deficits within the complex administrative architecture that a gradual reform seemed insufficient.
Kaum hatte sich die volatile Marktsituation kurzfristig stabilisiert, da führten externe Schocks erneut zu massiven Turbulenzen.;Hardly had the volatile market situation briefly stabilized when external shocks again led to massive turbulence.
Wenngleich der literarisch anspruchsvolle Diskurs bewusst mit intertextuellen Bezügen arbeitete, blieb seine argumentative Stringenz durchgehend erkennbar.;Although the literarily sophisticated discourse deliberately worked with intertextual references, its argumentative coherence remained consistently recognizable.
Alldieweil die regulatorischen Vorgaben kontinuierlich verschärft wurden, mussten die internationalen Konzerne ihre langfristigen Strategien grundlegend anpassen.;Since regulatory requirements were continuously tightened, the international corporations had to fundamentally adjust their long-term strategies.
Kraft seiner verfassungsmäßig garantierten Kompetenzen konnte das oberste Gericht die umstrittene Gesetzesnovelle außer Kraft setzen.;By virtue of its constitutionally guaranteed powers, the supreme court was able to invalidate the controversial legislative amendment.
Vermittels gezielter, evidenzbasierter Kommunikationsstrategien versuchte die Regierung, das erschütterte Vertrauen der Bevölkerung nachhaltig zurückzugewinnen.;By means of targeted, evidence-based communication strategies, the government attempted to sustainably regain the shaken trust of the population.
Unbeschadet ihrer fachlichen Exzellenz blieb die renommierte Expertin gegenüber überzogenen Erwartungen demonstrativ zurückhaltend.;Notwithstanding her professional excellence, the renowned expert remained demonstratively reserved toward exaggerated expectations.
Indessen verdichteten sich die Hinweise darauf, dass die komplexe Problemlage weit tiefgreifender war als ursprünglich angenommen.;Meanwhile, indications accumulated that the complex problem was far more profound than originally assumed.
Mitnichten lasse sich die vielschichtige Krise auf kurzfristige Marktmechanismen reduzieren, betonte der sachkundige Ökonom nachdrücklich.;By no means can the multifaceted crisis be reduced to short-term market mechanisms, the knowledgeable economist emphasized emphatically.
Schlechterdings unmöglich sei es, unter den gegebenen strukturellen Bedingungen eine nachhaltige Lösung zu implementieren.;It was absolutely impossible, under the given structural conditions, to implement a sustainable solution.
Gleichwohl eröffnete die vorsichtig ausgehandelte Vereinbarung einen begrenzten, aber realistischen Handlungsspielraum.;Nevertheless, the cautiously negotiated agreement opened a limited yet realistic scope for action.
Das ist ja wohl kaum als endgültige, strategisch durchdachte Antwort auf die systemische Herausforderung zu verstehen.;That can hardly be understood as a definitive, strategically thought-out response to the systemic challenge.
Sei dem, wie es wolle, die langfristigen Implikationen dieser tiefgreifenden Transformation werden sich erst in den kommenden Jahrzehnten vollständig entfalten.;Be that as it may, the long-term implications of this profound transformation will only fully unfold in the coming decades.
So komplex verschachtelt war die argumentative Konstruktion des juristischen Gutachtens, dass selbst erfahrene Fachleute sie mehrfach konzentriert durchdringen mussten.;So intricately layered was the argumentative construction of the legal opinion that even experienced experts had to work through it several times with concentration.
Wenngleich die interdisziplinäre Untersuchung eine Vielzahl empirischer Befunde zusammenführte, blieb die kausale Interpretation einzelner Phänomene hochgradig umstritten.;Although the interdisciplinary study brought together a multitude of empirical findings, the causal interpretation of individual phenomena remained highly controversial.
Alldieweil die rechtlichen Rahmenbedingungen sich stetig veränderten, mussten die langfristigen Verträge mehrfach angepasst werden.;Since the legal framework conditions were continuously changing, the long-term contracts had to be adjusted multiple times.
Kraft historischer Präzedenzfälle konnte das Gremium fundamentale Richtlinien für zukünftige Entscheidungen ableiten.;By virtue of historical precedents, the committee was able to derive fundamental guidelines for future decisions.
Vermittels einer präzise kalibrierten Risikoanalyse ließen sich potenziell gravierende Fehlentwicklungen frühzeitig erkennen und abwenden.;By means of a precisely calibrated risk analysis, potentially serious misdevelopments could be detected and averted at an early stage.
Unbeschadet der innerparteilichen Differenzen wurde die strategische Gesamtplanung konsistent weiterverfolgt.;Notwithstanding intra-party differences, the strategic overall planning was consistently pursued.
Eingedenk der politischen Brisanz der Entscheidung formulierte die Kommission ihre Stellungnahme besonders zurückhaltend und nuanciert.;Mindful of the political sensitivity of the decision, the commission formulated its statement in an especially cautious and nuanced manner.
Aus vertraglichen Gründen halber wurden sämtliche Vereinbarungen einer eingehenden juristischen Prüfung unterzogen.;For contractual reasons, all agreements were subjected to a thorough legal review.
Dieweil die internationalen Abstimmungsprozesse erheblich komplexer als prognostiziert verliefen, verzögerte sich die Implementierung des Projektes deutlich.;While the international coordination processes proved significantly more complex than predicted, the project’s implementation was considerably delayed.
Indes offenbarten weiterführende Analysen, dass die anfangs als eindeutig bewerteten Daten durchaus ambivalente Signale enthielten.;Meanwhile, further analyses revealed that the data initially assessed as clear indeed contained ambiguous signals.
Mitnichten dürfe man die sozioökonomischen Konsequenzen der Maßnahme unterschätzen, mahnte der erfahrene Analyst eindringlich.;By no means should one underestimate the socioeconomic consequences of the measure, the experienced analyst warned emphatically.
Schlechterdings inakzeptabel erschien die selektive Anwendung der methodischen Standards innerhalb der internationalen Fachgemeinschaft.;The selective application of methodological standards within the international professional community appeared absolutely unacceptable.
Gleichwohl konnte die institutionelle Stabilität, trotz erheblicher externer Belastungen, weitgehend bewahrt werden.;Nevertheless, institutional stability could be largely maintained despite significant external pressures.
Das hätte man doch sicherlich vorausschauender und kohärenter gestalten können, bemerkte die kritische Kommentatorin nüchtern.;That could certainly have been designed more foresightedly and coherently, the critical commentator remarked soberly.
Sei es, dass strukturelle Schwächen vorlagen, sei es, dass individuelle Fehlentscheidungen getroffen wurden, die Ursachen blieben komplex und vielschichtig.;Whether structural weaknesses existed or individual misjudgments were made, the causes remained complex and multifaceted.
Man unterschätze ja nicht die tiefgreifenden politischen und gesellschaftlichen Implikationen dauerhafter Reformmaßnahmen.;One should not underestimate the profound political and societal implications of permanent reform measures.
Zu reflektieren wäre indes, inwieweit die normativen Leitlinien konsequent und einheitlich angewandt wurden.;It would meanwhile be worth reflecting on the extent to which the normative guidelines were applied consistently and uniformly.
So gravierend waren die systemischen Fehlentwicklungen, dass inkrementelle Korrekturen nur begrenzte Wirkung entfalten konnten.;So serious were the systemic maldevelopments that incremental corrections could only have limited effect.
Kaum hatte sich die fragile Sicherheitslage kurzfristig entspannt, da führten neue externe Faktoren erneut zu einer Eskalation.;Hardly had the fragile security situation temporarily eased when new external factors again led to escalation.
Wenngleich die literarisch anspruchsvolle Argumentation bewusst mit subtilen Intertextualitäten arbeitete, blieb die zentrale Stoßrichtung klar erkennbar.;Although the literarily sophisticated argumentation deliberately employed subtle intertextualities, its central thrust remained clearly recognizable.
Alldieweil die demografischen Entwicklungen langfristige strukturelle Anpassungen erforderten, erwiesen sich kurzfristige politische Maßnahmen als kaum wirksam.;Since demographic developments required long-term structural adjustments, short-term political measures proved hardly effective.
Kraft ausdrücklicher verfassungsrechtlicher Garantien konnte das oberste Gericht die exekutive Maßnahme außer Kraft setzen.;By virtue of explicit constitutional guarantees, the supreme court was able to nullify the executive measure.
Vermittels gezielter multilateraler Konsultationen ließ sich ein fragiler diplomatischer Konsens herstellen.;By means of targeted multilateral consultations, a fragile diplomatic consensus could be established.
Unbeschadet ihrer kontroversen Positionierung blieb die fachlich anspruchsvolle Intervention der Expertin differenziert und analytisch präzise.;Notwithstanding her controversial positioning, the professionally demanding intervention of the expert remained differentiated and analytically precise.
Indessen verdichteten sich die empirischen Hinweise, dass die bisherige theoretische Annahme einer grundlegenden Revision bedurfte.;Meanwhile, empirical indications accumulated that the previous theoretical assumption required fundamental revision.
Mitnichten lasse sich die komplexe Dynamik auf einfache lineare Ursache-Wirkungs-Beziehungen reduzieren, erklärte der erfahrene Systemtheoretiker.;By no means can the complex dynamics be reduced to simple linear cause-effect relationships, the experienced systems theorist explained.
Schlechterdings unmöglich sei es, unter den gegebenen geopolitischen Rahmenbedingungen eine harmonisierte Lösung zu erzielen.;It was absolutely impossible, under the given geopolitical conditions, to achieve a harmonized solution.
Gleichwohl eröffnete die schrittweise implementierte Reform einen begrenzten, aber realistischen Handlungsspielraum.;Nevertheless, the gradually implemented reform opened a limited yet realistic scope for action.
Das ist ja wohl kaum als kohärente, langfristig tragfähige Gesamtstrategie zu bezeichnen, kritisierte der unabhängige Beobachter unverblümt.;That can hardly be described as a coherent, long-term viable overall strategy, the independent observer criticized bluntly.
Sei dem, wie ihm wolle, die tiefgreifenden strukturellen Veränderungen werden die institutionelle Landschaft nachhaltig prägen.;Be that as it may, the profound structural changes will shape the institutional landscape in a lasting way.
So komplex verschränkt war die theoretische Argumentation, dass selbst ausgewiesene Fachgelehrte sie nur mit erheblicher intellektueller Anstrengung vollständig durchdringen konnten.;So intricately interwoven was the theoretical argumentation that even established experts could only fully grasp it with considerable intellectual effort.
Die Regierung hätte die Krise vermeiden können, wenn sie früher gehandelt hätte.;The government could have avoided the crisis if it had acted earlier.
Es wird davon ausgegangen, dass die Wirtschaft im nächsten Quartal schrumpfen wird.;It is assumed that the economy will shrink in the next quarter.
Obwohl er sich bemüht hatte, konnte er die Erwartungen nicht erfüllen.;Although he had made an effort, he could not meet the expectations.
Die Maßnahmen wurden ergriffen, um die langfristigen Folgen des Klimawandels abzumildern.;The measures were taken to mitigate the long-term consequences of climate change.
Hätte man die Warnungen ernst genommen, wäre das Unglück verhindert worden.;Had the warnings been taken seriously, the disaster would have been prevented.
Der Philosoph vertrat die Ansicht, dass Moral kulturell bedingt sei.;The philosopher held the view that morality is culturally determined.
Es sei darauf hingewiesen, dass diese Theorie noch nicht bewiesen wurde.;It should be pointed out that this theory has not yet been proven.
Die Studie legt nahe, dass soziale Faktoren eine entscheidende Rolle spielen.;The study suggests that social factors play a decisive role.
Indem man nachhaltige Praktiken fördert, lässt sich die Umwelt schützen.;By promoting sustainable practices, the environment can be protected.
Der Vertrag wurde unterzeichnet, nachdem alle Bedingungen ausgehandelt worden waren.;The contract was signed after all conditions had been negotiated.
Es ist unerlässlich, dass sämtliche rechtlichen Vorgaben eingehalten werden.;It is essential that all legal requirements be complied with.
Die Forschungsergebnisse deuten darauf hin, dass weitere Untersuchungen erforderlich sind.;The research findings suggest that further investigations are necessary.
Sowohl die wirtschaftlichen als auch die sozialen Aspekte müssen berücksichtigt werden.;Both the economic and the social aspects must be taken into account.
Der Minister betonte, dass die Reform im Interesse aller Bürger liege.;The minister emphasized that the reform is in the interest of all citizens.
Es wäre wünschenswert gewesen, wenn man früher mit den Verhandlungen begonnen hätte.;It would have been desirable if negotiations had begun earlier.
Die Künstlerin ließ sich von den gesellschaftlichen Umbrüchen ihrer Zeit inspirieren.;The artist drew inspiration from the social upheavals of her time.
Trotz der Bemühungen der Regierung verschlechterte sich die Lage zusehends.;Despite the government's efforts, the situation deteriorated visibly.
Es steht außer Frage, dass Innovation für das Wirtschaftswachstum unabdingbar ist.;It is beyond question that innovation is indispensable for economic growth.
Die Analyse ergab, dass die bisherigen Ansätze nicht zielführend gewesen waren.;The analysis revealed that the previous approaches had not been effective.
Man könnte argumentieren, dass Globalisierung sowohl Chancen als auch Risiken birgt.;One could argue that globalization harbors both opportunities and risks.
Der Sachverhalt wurde so dargestellt, als ob keine Alternative bestanden hätte.;The matter was presented as if no alternative had existed.
Es bedarf einer umfassenden Überprüfung der geltenden Vorschriften und Richtlinien.;A comprehensive review of the existing regulations and guidelines is required.
Die Dissertation befasst sich mit der Frage, inwiefern Sprache Denken beeinflusst.;The dissertation deals with the question of to what extent language influences thought.
Unter der Voraussetzung, dass alle zustimmen, kann das Projekt realisiert werden.;On the condition that everyone agrees, the project can be realized.
Die Erkenntnisse der Neurowissenschaften haben unser Verständnis des Bewusstseins revolutioniert.;The findings of neuroscience have revolutionized our understanding of consciousness.
Es ist anzunehmen, dass die demografische Entwicklung gravierende Auswirkungen haben wird.;It is to be assumed that demographic development will have serious consequences.
Der Roman zeichnet sich durch eine außerordentlich komplexe Erzählstruktur aus.;The novel is characterized by an extraordinarily complex narrative structure.
Die Experten waren sich uneinig darüber, welche Strategie am erfolgversprechendsten sei.;The experts disagreed about which strategy would be most promising.
Mittels innovativer Technologien lassen sich Produktionsprozesse erheblich effizienter gestalten.;By means of innovative technologies, production processes can be made considerably more efficient.
Die Debatte über künstliche Intelligenz wirft grundlegende ethische Fragen auf.;The debate about artificial intelligence raises fundamental ethical questions.
Es stellte sich heraus, dass die anfänglichen Annahmen nicht haltbar waren.;It turned out that the initial assumptions were not tenable.
Der Wissenschaftler veröffentlichte seine Forschungsergebnisse in einer renommierten Fachzeitschrift.;The scientist published his research findings in a prestigious academic journal.
Angesichts der globalen Herausforderungen ist internationale Zusammenarbeit unerlässlich.;In view of the global challenges, international cooperation is essential.
Die Interpretation literarischer Texte erfordert ein tiefgreifendes kulturelles Verständnis.;The interpretation of literary texts requires a profound cultural understanding.
Es wäre zu wünschen gewesen, dass die Behörden transparenter kommuniziert hätten.;It would have been desirable if the authorities had communicated more transparently.
Die Auseinandersetzung mit philosophischen Fragestellungen schärft das kritische Denkvermögen.;The engagement with philosophical questions sharpens critical thinking ability.
Der Journalist wurde dafür kritisiert, dass er die Fakten tendenziös dargestellt habe.;The journalist was criticized for having presented the facts in a biased manner.
Inwieweit die Maßnahmen tatsächlich greifen, wird sich erst langfristig zeigen.;To what extent the measures actually take effect will only become apparent long-term.
Die zunehmende Digitalisierung stellt die Gesellschaft vor völlig neue Herausforderungen.;The increasing digitalization confronts society with completely new challenges.
Es bleibt abzuwarten, ob die vorgeschlagenen Reformen die gewünschten Ergebnisse erzielen.;It remains to be seen whether the proposed reforms achieve the desired results.
Der Komponist verstand es meisterhaft, traditionelle Elemente mit modernen zu verschmelzen.;The composer masterfully understood how to fuse traditional elements with modern ones.
Die Regierung sieht sich mit wachsendem Widerstand seitens der Opposition konfrontiert.;The government finds itself confronted with growing resistance from the opposition.
Es ist von entscheidender Bedeutung, dass nachhaltige Entwicklung oberste Priorität erhält.;It is of crucial importance that sustainable development receives top priority.
Die Untersuchung brachte zutage, dass systematische Versäumnisse vorgelegen hatten.;The investigation brought to light that systematic failures had existed.
Der Autor bedient sich einer metaphorischen Sprache, um abstrakte Konzepte zu veranschaulichen.;The author employs metaphorical language to illustrate abstract concepts.
Es wäre fahrlässig gewesen, die potenziellen Risiken außer Acht zu lassen.;It would have been negligent to disregard the potential risks.
Die Verflechtung von wirtschaftlichen und politischen Interessen ist offenkundig.;The intertwining of economic and political interests is evident.
Man kann davon ausgehen, dass technologischer Fortschritt die Arbeitswelt grundlegend verändert.;One can assume that technological progress fundamentally transforms the world of work.
Der Film thematisiert die existenziellen Ängste einer zutiefst verunsicherten Generation.;The film addresses the existential fears of a deeply unsettled generation.
Sofern keine unvorhergesehenen Komplikationen auftreten, sollte das Vorhaben gelingen.;Provided no unforeseen complications arise, the project should succeed.
Die Analyse offenbarte erhebliche Diskrepanzen zwischen Anspruch und Wirklichkeit.;The analysis revealed considerable discrepancies between aspiration and reality.
Es gilt als erwiesen, dass der Klimawandel menschengemacht ist.;It is considered proven that climate change is human-made.
Die Künstlergruppe setzte sich kritisch mit den Machtverhältnissen ihrer Epoche auseinander.;The artist group critically engaged with the power structures of their era.
Der Redner appellierte an das Verantwortungsbewusstsein der Anwesenden.;The speaker appealed to the sense of responsibility of those present.
Unbeschadet dessen müssen alternative Lösungsansätze in Betracht gezogen werden.;Notwithstanding this, alternative solution approaches must be considered.
Die Dissertation leistet einen bedeutenden Beitrag zur gegenwärtigen Forschungsdiskussion.;The dissertation makes a significant contribution to the current research discussion.
Es empfiehlt sich, sämtliche verfügbaren Informationsquellen kritisch zu hinterfragen.;It is advisable to critically question all available sources of information.
Der Historiker vertritt die These, dass ökonomische Faktoren ausschlaggebend gewesen seien.;The historian advocates the thesis that economic factors were decisive.
Die Komplexität der Problematik erfordert einen interdisziplinären Forschungsansatz.;The complexity of the problem requires an interdisciplinary research approach.
Es ist bedauerlich, dass konstruktive Vorschläge nicht hinreichend berücksichtigt wurden.;It is regrettable that constructive proposals were not sufficiently considered.
Die Verantwortlichen hätten besser daran getan, transparenter zu kommunizieren.;Those responsible would have done better to communicate more transparently.
Der Philosoph stellt die Frage, ob objektive Wahrheit überhaupt erkennbar sei.;The philosopher poses the question of whether objective truth is even recognizable.
Anhand konkreter Beispiele lässt sich die theoretische Argumentation besser nachvollziehen.;Using concrete examples, the theoretical argumentation can be better understood.
Die Erkenntnisse widersprechen der gängigen Auffassung, die bisher vorherrschte.;The findings contradict the common view that previously prevailed.
Es zeichnet sich ab, dass tiefgreifende strukturelle Veränderungen unvermeidlich sind.;It is becoming apparent that profound structural changes are inevitable.
Der Konflikt resultiert aus unvereinbaren ideologischen Positionen der beteiligten Parteien.;The conflict results from incompatible ideological positions of the involved parties.
Die Malerin experimentierte mit unkonventionellen Techniken und provozierte damit das Publikum.;The painter experimented with unconventional techniques and thereby provoked the audience.
Es ist fraglich, ob die vorgeschlagenen Maßnahmen den gewünschten Effekt erzielen.;It is questionable whether the proposed measures achieve the desired effect.
Die Studie kommt zu dem Schluss, dass Bildung entscheidend für Chancengleichheit ist.;The study comes to the conclusion that education is crucial for equal opportunity.
Der Dichter reflektiert in seinen Werken über die Vergänglichkeit menschlicher Existenz.;The poet reflects in his works on the transience of human existence.
Es bedürfte einer grundlegenden Reform, um die bestehenden Missstände zu beheben.;A fundamental reform would be needed to remedy the existing grievances.
Die zunehmende Polarisierung der Gesellschaft gibt Anlass zu ernsthafter Besorgnis.;The increasing polarization of society gives cause for serious concern.
Der Soziologe untersuchte, wie digitale Medien soziale Interaktionen nachhaltig verändern.;The sociologist investigated how digital media sustainably change social interactions.
Es liegt auf der Hand, dass ohne internationale Kooperation keine Lösung möglich ist.;It is obvious that without international cooperation no solution is possible.
Die Interpretation des Werkes erfordert fundierte Kenntnisse des historischen Kontextes.;The interpretation of the work requires solid knowledge of the historical context.
Der Berichterstatter hob hervor, dass dringender Handlungsbedarf bestehe.;The rapporteur emphasized that there is an urgent need for action.
Sofern die notwendigen Ressourcen bereitgestellt werden, kann das Ziel erreicht werden.;Provided the necessary resources are made available, the goal can be achieved.
Die Autorin hinterfragt tradierte Rollenbilder und plädiert für gesellschaftliche Neuorientierung.;The author questions traditional role models and advocates for social reorientation.
Es ist unbestritten, dass Bildung die Grundlage für gesellschaftlichen Fortschritt bildet.;It is undisputed that education forms the foundation for social progress.
Der Ökonom warnte davor, die makroökonomischen Risiken zu unterschätzen.;The economist warned against underestimating the macroeconomic risks.
Die Ausstellung bot einen umfassenden Überblick über zeitgenössische künstlerische Strömungen.;The exhibition offered a comprehensive overview of contemporary artistic movements.
Es wäre angebracht, die bisherigen Vorgehensweisen einer kritischen Überprüfung zu unterziehen.;It would be appropriate to subject the previous approaches to critical review.
Der Wissenschaftler postulierte, dass neue Paradigmen etabliert werden müssten.;The scientist postulated that new paradigms must be established.
Die Verknüpfung von Theorie und Praxis erweist sich als besonders fruchtbar.;The linking of theory and practice proves to be particularly fruitful.
Es kann nicht geleugnet werden, dass gravierende Defizite im System existieren.;It cannot be denied that serious deficits exist in the system.
Der Kritiker bemängelte, dass der Film zu sehr an der Oberfläche bleibe.;The critic criticized that the film remains too much on the surface.
Die Auswirkungen der Globalisierung manifestieren sich in allen gesellschaftlichen Bereichen.;The effects of globalization manifest themselves in all areas of society.
Es wäre verfehlt anzunehmen, dass einfache Lösungen für komplexe Probleme existieren.;It would be misguided to assume that simple solutions exist for complex problems.
Der Architekt konzipierte ein Gebäude, das Funktionalität mit ästhetischem Anspruch verbindet.;The architect designed a building that combines functionality with aesthetic aspiration.
Die Forschung legt den Schluss nahe, dass multikausale Zusammenhänge vorliegen.;The research suggests the conclusion that multicausal connections exist.
Es ist zu befürchten, dass die Schere zwischen Arm und Reich weiter auseinandergeht.;It is to be feared that the gap between rich and poor continues to widen.
Der Gelehrte widmete sich der Erforschung längst vergessener mittelalterlicher Manuskripte.;The scholar devoted himself to researching long-forgotten medieval manuscripts.
Die Auseinandersetzung mit der eigenen Vergangenheit ist für die Identitätsfindung wesentlich.;The engagement with one's own past is essential for identity formation.
Es steht zu erwarten, dass die Entwicklung sich in den kommenden Jahren beschleunigt.;It is to be expected that the development will accelerate in the coming years.
Der Komponist brach bewusst mit musikalischen Konventionen und schuf etwas völlig Neues.;The composer deliberately broke with musical conventions and created something completely new.
Die Bundesregierung kündigte an, dass die Steuern im nächsten Jahr gesenkt würden.;The federal government announced that taxes would be reduced next year.
Es ist unerlässlich, dass sämtliche Beteiligten ihre Verantwortung wahrnehmen.;It is essential that all involved parties assume their responsibility.
Der Sozialwissenschaftler analysierte, inwieweit soziale Ungleichheit das Bildungssystem beeinflusst.;The social scientist analyzed to what extent social inequality influences the educational system.
Die Umsetzung der geplanten Reformen stößt auf erheblichen Widerstand.;The implementation of the planned reforms encounters considerable resistance.
Es wäre angemessen gewesen, wenn die Betroffenen frühzeitig informiert worden wären.;It would have been appropriate if those affected had been informed early.
Der Diskurs über Migration wird von ideologischen Grabenkämpfen geprägt.;The discourse on migration is characterized by ideological trench warfare.
Die Verfassungsrichter urteilten, dass das Gesetz mit dem Grundgesetz vereinbar sei.;The constitutional judges ruled that the law is compatible with the constitution.
Es lässt sich nicht bestreiten, dass die Digitalisierung tiefgreifende Umwälzungen bewirkt.;It cannot be disputed that digitalization causes profound transformations.
Der Wissenschaftler postulierte eine Theorie, die bisherige Annahmen radikal infrage stellt.;The scientist postulated a theory that radically questions previous assumptions.
Die Ausstellung vermittelte einen eindrucksvollen Einblick in die expressionistische Malerei.;The exhibition conveyed an impressive insight into expressionist painting.
Es liegt nahe anzunehmen, dass ökologische Erwägungen künftig dominieren werden.;It is reasonable to assume that ecological considerations will dominate in future.
Der Dramatiker thematisierte die moralischen Dilemmata totalitärer Herrschaftssysteme.;The playwright addressed the moral dilemmas of totalitarian systems of rule.
Die Verhandlungsführer einigten sich darauf, dass ein Kompromiss gefunden werden müsse.;The negotiators agreed that a compromise must be found.
Es ist bezeichnend, dass gerade die einflussreichsten Akteure schweigen.;It is significant that precisely the most influential actors remain silent.
Der Ökonom prognostizierte, dass die Rezession gravierender ausfallen werde als erwartet.;The economist predicted that the recession would turn out more severe than expected.
Die Komplexität globaler Lieferketten erfordert ausgeklügelte logistische Lösungen.;The complexity of global supply chains requires sophisticated logistical solutions.
Es wäre fahrlässig, die Warnzeichen einer bevorstehenden Krise zu ignorieren.;It would be negligent to ignore the warning signs of an impending crisis.
Der Journalist deckte auf, dass systematische Korruption in der Verwaltung herrschte.;The journalist uncovered that systematic corruption prevailed in the administration.
Die Interpretation der Verfassung unterliegt einem stetigen gesellschaftlichen Aushandlungsprozess.;The interpretation of the constitution is subject to a constant social negotiation process.
Es zeichnet sich eine Tendenz ab, dass traditionelle Parteibindungen erodieren.;A tendency is emerging that traditional party loyalties are eroding.
Der Philosoph erörterte die Frage, ob Willensfreiheit eine Illusion sei.;The philosopher discussed the question of whether free will is an illusion.
Die Studie belegt eindrucksvoll, dass präventive Maßnahmen nachhaltig wirksam sind.;The study impressively demonstrates that preventive measures are sustainably effective.
Es ist unverkennbar, dass der Klimawandel bereits spürbare Auswirkungen zeitigt.;It is unmistakable that climate change is already producing noticeable effects.
Der Romancier schildert die Zerrissenheit einer Generation zwischen Tradition und Moderne.;The novelist depicts the torn nature of a generation between tradition and modernity.
Die Vertragsparteien verpflichteten sich, künftig transparenter miteinander zu kommunizieren.;The contracting parties committed themselves to communicate more transparently with each other in future.
Es bedarf keiner besonderen Erwähnung, dass Integrität unverzichtbar ist.;It needs no special mention that integrity is indispensable.
Der Kunsthistoriker legte dar, wie sehr politische Umbrüche künstlerisches Schaffen beeinflussen.;The art historian explained how much political upheavals influence artistic creation.
Die Maßnahmen zielen darauf ab, die strukturellen Defizite nachhaltig zu beheben.;The measures aim to remedy the structural deficits sustainably.
Es ist davon auszugehen, dass sich die Situation weiter zuspitzen wird.;It is to be assumed that the situation will further escalate.
Der Komponist ließ sich von volkstümlichen Melodien inspirieren und integrierte sie meisterhaft.;The composer drew inspiration from folk melodies and integrated them masterfully.
Die Debatte offenbarte tiefgreifende Meinungsverschiedenheiten hinsichtlich der künftigen Ausrichtung.;The debate revealed profound differences of opinion regarding the future direction.
Es wäre verfehlt zu glauben, dass technologische Lösungen alle Probleme beheben.;It would be misguided to believe that technological solutions remedy all problems.
Der Soziologe untersuchte, wie soziale Medien das kollektive Bewusstsein formen.;The sociologist investigated how social media shape collective consciousness.
Die Regierung sah sich genötigt, ihre ursprünglichen Pläne grundlegend zu revidieren.;The government found itself compelled to fundamentally revise its original plans.
Es ist offenkundig, dass die bisherigen Ansätze nicht die erhofften Ergebnisse erbrachten.;It is evident that the previous approaches did not yield the hoped-for results.
Der Historiker vertrat die Auffassung, dass ökonomische Interessen ausschlaggebend gewesen seien.;The historian held the view that economic interests had been decisive.
Die Analyse zeigt auf, dass vielschichtige Faktoren ineinandergreifen.;The analysis shows that multifaceted factors interlock.
Es bleibt abzuwarten, inwieweit die Reformen tatsächlich implementiert werden.;It remains to be seen to what extent the reforms are actually implemented.
Der Dichter reflektiert über die Entfremdung des modernen Menschen.;The poet reflects on the alienation of modern man.
Die Verantwortlichen wurden aufgefordert, unverzüglich Rechenschaft abzulegen.;Those responsible were called upon to give account immediately.
Es ist unbestritten, dass Bildungsgerechtigkeit eine zentrale gesellschaftliche Aufgabe darstellt.;It is undisputed that educational equity represents a central societal task.
Der Architekt entwarf ein innovatives Konzept, das ökologische Nachhaltigkeit priorisiert.;The architect designed an innovative concept that prioritizes ecological sustainability.
Die Forschungsergebnisse lassen den Schluss zu, dass weitere Untersuchungen notwendig sind.;The research results allow the conclusion that further investigations are necessary.
Es ist zu befürchten, dass die Kluft zwischen den Generationen sich vertieft.;It is to be feared that the gap between the generations deepens.
Der Minister betonte nachdrücklich, dass die Reform alternativlos sei.;The minister emphatically stressed that the reform is without alternative.
Die Künstlerin thematisiert in ihren Werken die Fragilität menschlicher Beziehungen.;The artist addresses in her works the fragility of human relationships.
Es wäre wünschenswert, dass mehr Mittel für die Forschung bereitgestellt würden.;It would be desirable that more funds be made available for research.
Der Ökonom warnte eindringlich vor den Folgen einer ungehemmten Staatsverschuldung.;The economist urgently warned of the consequences of unchecked national debt.
Die Dissertation leistet einen wichtigen Beitrag zur Weiterentwicklung der Theorie.;The dissertation makes an important contribution to the further development of the theory.
Es liegt in der Natur der Sache, dass komplexe Fragen keine einfachen Antworten zulassen.;It lies in the nature of things that complex questions permit no simple answers.
Der Schriftsteller setzt sich kritisch mit den Herrschaftsmechanismen seiner Epoche auseinander.;The writer critically engages with the mechanisms of power of his era.
Die Maßnahmen wurden ergriffen, um die Wettbewerbsfähigkeit der Wirtschaft zu stärken.;The measures were taken to strengthen the competitiveness of the economy.
Es ist anzunehmen, dass demographische Veränderungen die Sozialsysteme belasten werden.;It is to be assumed that demographic changes will burden the social systems.
Der Regisseur bedient sich einer komplexen Erzähltechnik, um verschiedene Perspektiven darzustellen.;The director employs a complex narrative technique to present different perspectives.
Die Experten sind sich einig, dass dringender Handlungsbedarf besteht.;The experts agree that there is an urgent need for action.
Es hat sich gezeigt, dass interdisziplinäre Ansätze besonders fruchtbar sind.;It has been shown that interdisciplinary approaches are particularly fruitful.
Der Philosoph stellte die provokante These auf, dass Moral rein konstruiert sei.;The philosopher put forward the provocative thesis that morality is purely constructed.
Die Untersuchung ergab, dass gravierende Versäumnisse in der Aufsicht vorlagen.;The investigation revealed that serious failures in supervision existed.
Es bedarf einer umfassenden gesellschaftlichen Debatte über die zukünftige Ausrichtung.;A comprehensive societal debate about the future direction is needed.
Der Komponist revolutionierte mit seinen Werken die zeitgenössische Musiklandschaft.;The composer revolutionized the contemporary music landscape with his works.
Die Analyse verdeutlicht, dass systemische Zusammenhänge häufig unterschätzt werden.;The analysis clarifies that systemic connections are frequently underestimated.
Es ist bezeichnend, dass gerade jene schweigen, die Verantwortung tragen.;It is significant that precisely those remain silent who bear responsibility.
Der Wissenschaftler veröffentlichte seine bahnbrechenden Erkenntnisse in einer Fachpublikation.;The scientist published his groundbreaking findings in a specialist publication.
Die Bevölkerung erwartet, dass die Regierung konkrete Lösungen präsentiert.;The population expects that the government presents concrete solutions.
Es wäre angebracht gewesen, die Öffentlichkeit frühzeitig einzubeziehen.;It would have been appropriate to involve the public early.
Der Kritiker bemängelte die mangelnde konzeptionelle Kohärenz des Werkes.;The critic criticized the lacking conceptual coherence of the work.
Die Verflechtung globaler Finanzmärkte birgt erhebliche systemische Risiken.;The interconnection of global financial markets harbors considerable systemic risks.
Es ist fraglich, ob die vorgeschlagenen Lösungen den Anforderungen gerecht werden.;It is questionable whether the proposed solutions meet the requirements.
Der Sozialwissenschaftler untersuchte die Mechanismen sozialer Mobilität in modernen Gesellschaften.;The social scientist investigated the mechanisms of social mobility in modern societies.
Die Künstlergruppe provozierte mit ihren Installationen heftige öffentliche Kontroversen.;The artist group provoked intense public controversies with their installations.
Es zeichnet sich ab, dass grundlegende Strukturreformen unumgänglich sind.;It is becoming apparent that fundamental structural reforms are unavoidable.
Der Historiker rekonstruierte minutiös die Ereignisse jener schicksalhaften Jahre.;The historian meticulously reconstructed the events of those fateful years.
Die Studie kommt zu dem Ergebnis, dass präventive Ansätze wirksamer sind.;The study comes to the result that preventive approaches are more effective.
Es ist unerlässlich, dass alle Beteiligten konstruktiv zusammenarbeiten.;It is essential that all involved parties cooperate constructively.
Der Ökonom plädierte für eine grundlegende Neugestaltung des Steuersystems.;The economist advocated for a fundamental redesign of the tax system.
Die Interpretation der Daten erfordert profunde statistische und methodologische Kenntnisse.;The interpretation of the data requires profound statistical and methodological knowledge.
Es ist nicht von der Hand zu weisen, dass erhebliche Defizite bestehen.;It cannot be denied that considerable deficits exist.
Der Romancier entwirft ein vielschichtiges Panorama einer untergehenden Gesellschaftsordnung.;The novelist drafts a multifaceted panorama of a declining social order.
Die Verhandlungen gestalteten sich äußerst zäh, da fundamentale Interessenskonflikte bestanden.;The negotiations proved extremely tough because fundamental conflicts of interest existed.
Es wäre illusorisch anzunehmen, dass sich die Probleme von selbst lösen.;It would be illusory to assume that the problems solve themselves.
Der Wissenschaftler entwickelte ein innovatives Modell zur Erklärung komplexer Phänomene.;The scientist developed an innovative model for explaining complex phenomena.
Die Regierung kündigte an, die Investitionen in Infrastruktur massiv auszuweiten.;The government announced to massively expand investments in infrastructure.
Es liegt auf der Hand, dass nachhaltige Lösungen einen Paradigmenwechsel erfordern.;It is obvious that sustainable solutions require a paradigm shift.
Der Dichter bedient sich einer metaphernreichen Sprache voller symbolischer Anspielungen.;The poet employs a metaphor-rich language full of symbolic allusions.
Die Analyse offenbart, dass strukturelle Machtasymmetrien das System prägen.;The analysis reveals that structural power asymmetries shape the system.
Es ist zu erwarten, dass die technologische Entwicklung sich weiter beschleunigt.;It is to be expected that technological development continues to accelerate.
Der Philosoph hinterfragt die Prämissen, auf denen das herrschende Weltbild beruht.;The philosopher questions the premises on which the prevailing worldview rests.
Die Maßnahmen zielen darauf ab, soziale Gerechtigkeit nachhaltig zu fördern.;The measures aim to promote social justice sustainably.
Es bedarf keiner weiteren Erläuterung, dass Transparenz fundamental wichtig ist.;It needs no further explanation that transparency is fundamentally important.
Der Architekt schuf ein Gebäude, das Funktionalität und Ästhetik harmonisch vereint.;The architect created a building that harmoniously unites functionality and aesthetics.
Die Forschung legt nahe, dass epigenetische Faktoren eine bedeutende Rolle spielen.;The research suggests that epigenetic factors play a significant role.
Es ist unverkennbar, dass gesellschaftlicher Zusammenhalt zunehmend erodiert.;It is unmistakable that social cohesion is increasingly eroding.
Der Komponist experimentierte mit atonalen Strukturen und traditionellen harmonischen Elementen.;The composer experimented with atonal structures and traditional harmonic elements.
Die Debatte verdeutlicht, wie polarisiert die öffentliche Meinung mittlerweile ist.;The debate clarifies how polarized public opinion has become in the meantime.
Es wäre verfehlt, die Bedeutung kultureller Faktoren zu unterschätzen.;It would be misguided to underestimate the significance of cultural factors.
Der Soziologe analysierte die Auswirkungen neoliberaler Wirtschaftspolitik auf soziale Strukturen.;The sociologist analyzed the effects of neoliberal economic policy on social structures.
Die Künstlerin hinterfragt tradierte Geschlechterrollen durch provokative visuelle Interventionen.;The artist questions traditional gender roles through provocative visual interventions.
Es ist davon auszugehen, dass Ressourcenknappheit künftig Konflikte verschärfen wird.;It is to be assumed that resource scarcity will intensify conflicts in future.
Der Historiker vertritt die These, dass ideologische Motive unterschätzt werden.;The historian advocates the thesis that ideological motives are underestimated.
Die Umsetzung des Vorhabens erfordert erhebliche finanzielle und personelle Ressourcen.;The implementation of the project requires considerable financial and personnel resources.
Es bleibt offen, ob die angestrebten Ziele tatsächlich erreicht werden können.;It remains open whether the targeted goals can actually be achieved.
Der Schriftsteller schildert eindringlich die Absurditäten bürokratischer Apparate.;The writer vividly depicts the absurdities of bureaucratic apparatuses.
Die Vertragsparteien verpflichteten sich zu weitreichenden Zugeständnissen.;The contracting parties committed themselves to far-reaching concessions.
Es ist unbestritten, dass Innovation der Schlüssel zu wirtschaftlichem Erfolg ist.;It is undisputed that innovation is the key to economic success.
Der Ökonom prognostizierte eine anhaltende Phase wirtschaftlicher Stagnation.;The economist predicted a prolonged phase of economic stagnation.
Die Interpretation erfordert ein tiefgreifendes Verständnis des kulturellen Kontextes.;The interpretation requires a profound understanding of the cultural context.
Es zeichnet sich eine Entwicklung ab, die grundlegende Veränderungen nach sich zieht.;A development is emerging that entails fundamental changes.
Der Regisseur inszenierte eine vielschichtige Reflexion über Macht und Ohnmacht.;The director staged a multifaceted reflection on power and powerlessness.
Die Forschungsergebnisse widersprechen der lange Zeit vorherrschenden wissenschaftlichen Meinung.;The research findings contradict the long-prevailing scientific opinion.
Es wäre wünschenswert, dass ethische Erwägungen stärker berücksichtigt würden.;It would be desirable that ethical considerations be given greater consideration.
Der Philosoph erörterte die erkenntnistheoretischen Grundlagen wissenschaftlicher Methodik.;The philosopher discussed the epistemological foundations of scientific methodology.
Die Studie dokumentiert eindrucksvoll die Auswirkungen sozialer Ungleichheit.;The study impressively documents the effects of social inequality.
Es ist bezeichnend, dass die Verantwortlichen sich jeglicher Stellungnahme enthalten.;It is significant that those responsible refrain from any statement.
Der Komponist integrierte Elemente verschiedenster musikalischer Traditionen in sein Werk.;The composer integrated elements of various musical traditions into his work.
Die Maßnahmen wurden implementiert, um die Effizienz der Verwaltung zu steigern.;The measures were implemented to increase the efficiency of the administration.
Es ist anzunehmen, dass der demografische Wandel gravierende Konsequenzen haben wird.;It is to be assumed that demographic change will have serious consequences.
Der Künstler schuf monumentale Skulpturen, die traditionelle Formsprachen dekonstruieren.;The artist created monumental sculptures that deconstruct traditional formal languages.
Die Analyse zeigt auf, dass die Ursachen vielschichtig und komplex sind.;The analysis shows that the causes are multifaceted and complex.
Es bedarf einer grundlegenden Neuausrichtung der politischen Strategie.;A fundamental reorientation of the political strategy is needed.
Der Sozialwissenschaftler untersuchte Mechanismen gesellschaftlicher Exklusion und Inklusion.;The social scientist investigated mechanisms of societal exclusion and inclusion.
Die Regierung sah sich massiver Kritik seitens der Zivilgesellschaft ausgesetzt.;The government found itself exposed to massive criticism from civil society.
Es ist fraglich, inwieweit die Maßnahmen verfassungskonform sind.;It is questionable to what extent the measures are constitutional.
Der Romancier entwirft ein düsteres Szenario einer dystopischen Zukunftsgesellschaft.;The novelist drafts a bleak scenario of a dystopian future society.
Die Diskussion offenbarte fundamentale Divergenzen in den weltanschaulichen Grundpositionen.;The discussion revealed fundamental divergences in the ideological basic positions.
Es wäre fahrlässig, die langfristigen Folgen außer Acht zu lassen.;It would be negligent to disregard the long-term consequences.
Der Historiker rekonstruierte die komplexen Machtstrukturen des untergegangenen Reiches.;The historian reconstructed the complex power structures of the collapsed empire.
Die Verflechtung ökonomischer und politischer Interessen ist augenfällig.;The interconnection of economic and political interests is obvious.
Es liegt nahe, dass technologischer Wandel gesellschaftliche Umbrüche beschleunigt.;It is reasonable that technological change accelerates societal upheavals.
Der Ökonom entwickelte ein Modell zur Analyse makroökonomischer Ungleichgewichte.;The economist developed a model for analyzing macroeconomic imbalances.
Die Künstlergruppe thematisierte die Entfremdung in spätkapitalistischen Konsumgesellschaften.;The artist group addressed alienation in late-capitalist consumer societies.
Es ist unerlässlich, dass wissenschaftliche Erkenntnisse in politisches Handeln einfließen.;It is essential that scientific findings flow into political action.
Der Philosoph stellte die Frage, ob objektive Erkenntnis prinzipiell möglich sei.;The philosopher posed the question of whether objective knowledge is principally possible.
Die Forschung legt den Schluss nahe, dass genetische Prädisposition differenziert betrachtet werden muss.;The research suggests the conclusion that genetic predisposition must be viewed in a differentiated manner.
Es zeichnet sich ab, dass die Polarisierung der Gesellschaft weiter zunimmt.;It is becoming apparent that the polarization of society continues to increase.
Der Komponist brach radikal mit den ästhetischen Konventionen seiner Zeit.;The composer radically broke with the aesthetic conventions of his time.
Die Interpretation der Verfassung unterliegt einem kontinuierlichen gesellschaftlichen Diskurs.;The interpretation of the constitution is subject to a continuous societal discourse.
Es wäre verfehlt anzunehmen, dass isolierte Einzelmaßnahmen ausreichen.;It would be misguided to assume that isolated individual measures suffice.
Der Wissenschaftler publizierte seine Erkenntnisse in führenden internationalen Fachzeitschriften.;The scientist published his findings in leading international journals.
Die Regierung kündigte umfassende Reformen des Gesundheitssystems an.;The government announced comprehensive reforms of the healthcare system.
Es ist offenkundig, dass die bisherige Strategie nicht zum Erfolg führte.;It is evident that the previous strategy did not lead to success.
Der Dichter reflektiert über die existenzielle Einsamkeit des modernen Individuums.;The poet reflects on the existential loneliness of the modern individual.
Die Maßnahmen zielen darauf ab, die internationale Wettbewerbsfähigkeit zu sichern.;The measures aim to secure international competitiveness.
Es bleibt abzuwarten, welche langfristigen Auswirkungen sich manifestieren werden.;It remains to be seen which long-term effects will manifest themselves.
Der Architekt konzipierte ein nachhaltiges Stadtentwicklungskonzept für die Metropolregion.;The architect conceived a sustainable urban development concept for the metropolitan region.
Die Studie belegt, dass sozioökonomische Faktoren entscheidenden Einfluss ausüben.;The study proves that socioeconomic factors exert decisive influence.
Es ist zu befürchten, dass die Ungleichheit weiter zunehmen wird.;It is to be feared that inequality will continue to increase.
Der Soziologe analysierte, wie digitale Technologien Arbeitsverhältnisse transformieren.;The sociologist analyzed how digital technologies transform employment relationships.
Die Künstlerin schuf raumgreifende Installationen, die den Betrachter körperlich involvieren.;The artist created expansive installations that physically involve the viewer.
Es ist unverkennbar, dass globale Herausforderungen koordinierte Antworten erfordern.;It is unmistakable that global challenges require coordinated responses.
Der Ökonom warnte vor den destabilisierenden Effekten spekulativer Finanzmärkte.;The economist warned of the destabilizing effects of speculative financial markets.
Die Dissertation trägt wesentlich zur Klärung umstrittener theoretischer Fragen bei.;The dissertation contributes substantially to clarifying disputed theoretical questions.
Es wäre wünschenswert gewesen, wenn transparentere Entscheidungsprozesse etabliert worden wären.;It would have been desirable if more transparent decision-making processes had been established.
Der Schriftsteller thematisiert die moralische Erosion in einer kommerzialisierten Gesellschaft.;The writer addresses the moral erosion in a commercialized society.
Die Verhandlungsführer einigten sich auf einen Kompromiss, der allen Seiten entgegenkommt.;The negotiators agreed on a compromise that accommodates all sides.
Es ist anzunehmen, dass die Entwicklung sich in den kommenden Dekaden beschleunigt.;It is to be assumed that the development accelerates in the coming decades.
Der Historiker legte dar, wie ideologische Narrative historische Ereignisse prägen.;The historian explained how ideological narratives shape historical events.
Die Komplexität internationaler Beziehungen erfordert differenzierte analytische Ansätze.;The complexity of international relations requires differentiated analytical approaches.
Es liegt auf der Hand, dass nachhaltige Entwicklung globale Kooperation voraussetzt.;It is obvious that sustainable development presupposes global cooperation.
Der Komponist schuf ein Werk, das unterschiedlichste Stilelemente synthesiert.;The composer created a work that synthesizes the most diverse stylistic elements.
Die Analyse verdeutlicht, dass systemische Interdependenzen häufig verkannt werden.;The analysis clarifies that systemic interdependencies are frequently misjudged.
Es bedarf keiner besonderen Betonung, dass Rechtsstaatlichkeit unverzichtbar ist.;It needs no special emphasis that the rule of law is indispensable.
Der Philosoph hinterfragte die anthropozentrischen Prämissen westlicher Denktraditionen.;The philosopher questioned the anthropocentric premises of Western intellectual traditions.
Die Forschungsergebnisse haben weitreichende Implikationen für die klinische Praxis.;The research findings have far-reaching implications for clinical practice.
Es ist bezeichnend, dass gerade die Mächtigen sich der Verantwortung entziehen.;It is significant that precisely the powerful evade responsibility.
Der Regisseur inszenierte eine komplexe Meditation über Schuld und Sühne.;The director staged a complex meditation on guilt and atonement.
Die Maßnahmen wurden konzipiert, um die soziale Kohäsion zu stärken.;The measures were conceived to strengthen social cohesion.
Es zeichnet sich eine Tendenz ab, die etablierte Strukturen grundlegend infrage stellt.;A tendency is emerging that fundamentally questions established structures.
Der Sozialwissenschaftler untersuchte die Mechanismen symbolischer Gewalt in Institutionen.;The social scientist investigated the mechanisms of symbolic violence in institutions.
Die Künstlergruppe provozierte mit ihren Aktionen einen gesellschaftlichen Reflexionsprozess.;The artist group provoked a societal reflection process with their actions.
Es ist fraglich, ob die Ziele unter den gegebenen Rahmenbedingungen erreichbar sind.;It is questionable whether the goals are achievable under the given framework conditions.
Der Ökonom plädierte für eine stärkere Regulierung der Finanzmärkte.;The economist advocated for stronger regulation of financial markets.
Die Interpretation setzt umfassende Kenntnisse der kulturgeschichtlichen Zusammenhänge voraus.;The interpretation presupposes comprehensive knowledge of the cultural-historical contexts.
Es ist unbestritten, dass Bildung der Schlüssel zu gesellschaftlicher Teilhabe ist.;It is undisputed that education is the key to social participation.
Der Romancier entwirft ein vielschichtiges Porträt einer im Umbruch befindlichen Gesellschaft.;The novelist drafts a multifaceted portrait of a society in transition.
Die Studie kommt zu dem Schluss, dass multifaktorielle Ansätze erfolgversprechender sind.;The study comes to the conclusion that multifactorial approaches are more promising.
Es wäre angebracht, die Perspektiven marginalisierter Gruppen stärker zu berücksichtigen.;It would be appropriate to give greater consideration to the perspectives of marginalized groups.
Der Architekt entwarf ein Konzept, das ökologische und soziale Nachhaltigkeit integriert.;The architect designed a concept that integrates ecological and social sustainability.
Die Forschung legt nahe, dass neuroplastische Prozesse lebenslang fortdauern.;The research suggests that neuroplastic processes continue throughout life.
Es ist zu erwarten, dass die Diskrepanzen sich weiter verschärfen werden.;It is to be expected that the discrepancies will further intensify.
Der Komponist integrierte mikrotonale Elemente in seine atonalen Kompositionen.;The composer integrated microtonal elements into his atonal compositions.
Die Debatte offenbarte tiefgreifende Dissense hinsichtlich normativer Grundfragen.;The debate revealed profound dissent regarding normative fundamental questions.
Es ist unerlässlich, dass wissenschaftliche Integrität gewahrt bleibt.;It is essential that scientific integrity is maintained.
Der Philosoph entwickelte eine Theorie, die erkenntnistheoretische und ethische Dimensionen verbindet.;The philosopher developed a theory that connects epistemological and ethical dimensions.
Die Maßnahmen wurden implementiert, um strukturelle Benachteiligungen abzubauen.;The measures were implemented to dismantle structural disadvantages.
Es liegt nahe anzunehmen, dass technologische Disruption sich fortsetzt.;It is reasonable to assume that technological disruption continues.
Der Historiker analysierte die ideologischen Legitimationsstrategien totalitärer Regime.;The historian analyzed the ideological legitimation strategies of totalitarian regimes.
Die Künstlerin thematisiert in ihren Arbeiten die Konstruktion kollektiver Identitäten.;The artist addresses in her works the construction of collective identities.
Es bedarf einer kritischen Reflexion der normativen Grundlagen.;A critical reflection of the normative foundations is needed.
Der Soziologe untersuchte die Reproduktion sozialer Ungleichheit im Bildungssystem.;The sociologist investigated the reproduction of social inequality in the educational system.
Die Regierung sah sich gezwungen, ihre Position grundlegend zu überdenken.;The government found itself forced to fundamentally reconsider its position.
Es ist offenkundig, dass die Herausforderungen nur gemeinsam bewältigt werden können.;It is evident that the challenges can only be overcome together.
Der Ökonom entwickelte ein innovatives Konzept zur Messung gesellschaftlichen Wohlstands.;The economist developed an innovative concept for measuring societal prosperity.
Die Interpretation erfordert eine differenzierte Berücksichtigung kontextueller Faktoren.;The interpretation requires a differentiated consideration of contextual factors.
Es wäre illusorisch zu glauben, dass einfache Antworten existieren.;It would be illusory to believe that simple answers exist.
Der Schriftsteller schildert die psychologischen Abgründe menschlicher Existenz.;The writer depicts the psychological abysses of human existence.
Die Forschungsergebnisse haben paradigmatische Bedeutung für das gesamte Fachgebiet.;The research findings have paradigmatic significance for the entire discipline.
Es zeichnet sich ab, dass fundamentale Weichenstellungen erforderlich sind.;It is becoming apparent that fundamental course-settings are required.
Der Komponist experimentierte mit der Verschmelzung elektronischer und akustischer Klangwelten.;The composer experimented with the fusion of electronic and acoustic sound worlds.
Die Analyse verdeutlicht die Notwendigkeit interdisziplinärer Forschungskooperationen.;The analysis clarifies the necessity of interdisciplinary research collaborations.
Es ist anzunehmen, dass die Transformation alle gesellschaftlichen Bereiche erfassen wird.;It is to be assumed that the transformation will encompass all societal areas.
Der Architekt schuf einen Raum, der kontemplative Erfahrungen ermöglicht.;The architect created a space that enables contemplative experiences.
Die Studie belegt eindrucksvoll die Wirksamkeit präventiver Interventionen.;The study impressively demonstrates the effectiveness of preventive interventions.
Es ist unverkennbar, dass die Legitimität etablierter Institutionen schwindet.;It is unmistakable that the legitimacy of established institutions is waning.
Der Philosoph hinterfragte die metaphysischen Grundannahmen rationalistischer Philosophie.;The philosopher questioned the metaphysical basic assumptions of rationalist philosophy.
Die Maßnahmen zielen darauf ab, die Resilienz der Gesellschaft zu erhöhen.;The measures aim to increase the resilience of society.
Es wäre verfehlt, die kulturellen Dimensionen ökonomischer Prozesse zu negieren.;It would be misguided to negate the cultural dimensions of economic processes.
Der Sozialwissenschaftler analysierte die Auswirkungen neoliberaler Gouvernementalität.;The social scientist analyzed the effects of neoliberal governmentality.
Die Künstlergruppe intervenierte im öffentlichen Raum mit partizipativen Projekten.;The artist group intervened in public space with participatory projects.
Es ist zu befürchten, dass die Fragmentierung der Öffentlichkeit zunimmt.;It is to be feared that the fragmentation of the public sphere increases.
Der Historiker rekonstruierte die diskursiven Formationen einer vergangenen Epoche.;The historian reconstructed the discursive formations of a past era.
Die Verflechtung von Wissen und Macht wurde eingehend analysiert.;The interconnection of knowledge and power was analyzed in depth.
Es liegt auf der Hand, dass systemische Krisen systemische Antworten erfordern.;It is obvious that systemic crises require systemic responses.
Der Ökonom warnte vor den distributiven Effekten technologischen Wandels.;The economist warned of the distributive effects of technological change.
Die Dissertation leistet einen innovativen Beitrag zur theoretischen Fundierung.;The dissertation makes an innovative contribution to the theoretical foundation.
Es ist bezeichnend, dass marginalisierte Stimmen systematisch ausgeblendet werden.;It is significant that marginalized voices are systematically excluded.
Der Romancier dekonstruiert in seinem Werk tradierte narrative Strukturen.;The novelist deconstructs in his work traditional narrative structures.
Die Verhandlungen gestalteten sich schwierig, da unvereinbare Positionen aufeinandertrafen.;The negotiations proved difficult because incompatible positions clashed.
Es wäre angebracht gewesen, zivilgesellschaftliche Akteure einzubeziehen.;It would have been appropriate to involve civil society actors.
Der Komponist schuf ein Werk, das die Grenzen zwischen Geräusch und Musik auslotet.;The composer created a work that explores the boundaries between noise and music.
Die Forschung legt nahe, dass epigenetische Mechanismen transgenerational wirken.;The research suggests that epigenetic mechanisms act transgenerationally.
Es ist unbestritten, dass demokratische Teilhabe fundamentale Voraussetzung ist.;It is undisputed that democratic participation is a fundamental prerequisite.
Der Philosoph erörterte die ontologischen Implikationen quantenphysikalischer Erkenntnisse.;The philosopher discussed the ontological implications of quantum physical findings.
Die Maßnahmen wurden ergriffen, um die ökologische Transformation zu beschleunigen.;The measures were taken to accelerate the ecological transformation.
Es bleibt offen, inwieweit die Prognosen sich als zutreffend erweisen.;It remains open to what extent the forecasts prove to be accurate.
Der Architekt entwickelte ein Konzept, das partizipative Planungsprozesse integriert.;The architect developed a concept that integrates participatory planning processes.
Die Interpretation setzt eine dekonstruktive Lektüre des Textes voraus.;The interpretation presupposes a deconstructive reading of the text.
Es zeichnet sich eine Entwicklung ab, die bestehende Machtstrukturen destabilisiert.;A development is emerging that destabilizes existing power structures.
Der Soziologe untersuchte die Prekarisierung von Arbeitsverhältnissen in postindustriellen Gesellschaften.;The sociologist investigated the precarization of employment relationships in post-industrial societies.
Die Künstlerin hinterfragt hegemoniale Repräsentationsformen durch subversive ästhetische Strategien.;The artist questions hegemonic forms of representation through subversive aesthetic strategies.
Es ist fraglich, ob die normativen Ansprüche eingelöst werden können.;It is questionable whether the normative claims can be redeemed.
Der Ökonom plädierte für eine Abkehr von wachstumsorientierten Wirtschaftsmodellen.;The economist advocated for a departure from growth-oriented economic models.
Die Studie dokumentiert die strukturellen Barrieren gesellschaftlicher Teilhabe.;The study documents the structural barriers to social participation.
Es wäre wünschenswert, dass emanzipatorische Perspektiven stärker Berücksichtigung fänden.;It would be desirable that emancipatory perspectives receive stronger consideration.
Der Historiker analysierte die diskursiven Praktiken kolonialer Herrschaft.;The historian analyzed the discursive practices of colonial rule.
Die Forschungsergebnisse fordern die Revision etablierter theoretischer Paradigmen.;The research findings demand the revision of established theoretical paradigms.
Es ist anzunehmen, dass die Digitalisierung sämtliche Lebensbereiche durchdringt.;It is to be assumed that digitalization penetrates all areas of life.
Der Komponist integrierte aleatorische Verfahren in seine seriellen Kompositionen.;The composer integrated aleatory procedures into his serial compositions.
Die Debatte offenbarte fundamentale epistemologische Differenzen.;The debate revealed fundamental epistemological differences.
Es bedarf einer kritischen Auseinandersetzung mit den hegemonialen Diskursen.;A critical engagement with the hegemonic discourses is needed.
Der Philosoph entwickelte eine posthumanistische Theorie der Subjektivität.;The philosopher developed a posthumanist theory of subjectivity.
Die Maßnahmen zielen darauf ab, sozioökonomische Disparitäten abzubauen.;The measures aim to reduce socioeconomic disparities.
Es ist unerlässlich, dass intersektionale Perspektiven einbezogen werden.;It is essential that intersectional perspectives are included.
Der Romancier thematisiert die Auflösung traditioneller Identitätskategorien.;The novelist addresses the dissolution of traditional identity categories.
Die Analyse verdeutlicht die Notwendigkeit einer Neukonzeption gesellschaftlicher Solidarität.;The analysis clarifies the necessity of a reconceptualization of social solidarity.
Es liegt nahe, dass die Transformation disruptive Effekte zeitigen wird.;It is reasonable that the transformation will produce disruptive effects.
Der Architekt konzipierte einen Raum, der hierarchische Raumordnungen dekonstruiert.;The architect conceived a space that deconstructs hierarchical spatial orders.
Die Forschung legt nahe, dass komplexe Systeme nichtlineare Dynamiken aufweisen.;The research suggests that complex systems exhibit nonlinear dynamics.
Es ist zu erwarten, dass die Pluralisierung der Lebensentwürfe fortschreitet.;It is to be expected that the pluralization of life designs continues.
Der Sozialwissenschaftler untersuchte die Ökonomisierung sozialer Beziehungen.;The social scientist investigated the economization of social relationships.
Die Künstlergruppe praktiziert eine Ästhetik des Widerstands gegen Kommodifizierung.;The artist group practices an aesthetics of resistance against commodification.
Es ist offenkundig, dass die Krise strukturelle Ursachen hat.;It is evident that the crisis has structural causes.
Der Ökonom entwickelte ein alternatives Modell jenseits neoklassischer Axiome.;The economist developed an alternative model beyond neoclassical axioms.
Die Dissertation trägt zur Theoretisierung postkolonialer Machtverhältnisse bei.;The dissertation contributes to the theorization of postcolonial power relations.
Es wäre illusorisch anzunehmen, dass technokratische Lösungen genügen.;It would be illusory to assume that technocratic solutions suffice.
Der Schriftsteller experimentiert mit fragmentierten narrativen Strukturen.;The writer experiments with fragmented narrative structures.
Die Interpretation erfordert eine genealogische Analyse der Diskursformation.;The interpretation requires a genealogical analysis of the discourse formation.
Es zeichnet sich ab, dass die Hegemonie neoliberaler Rationalität bröckelt.;It is becoming apparent that the hegemony of neoliberal rationality is crumbling.
Der Komponist dekonstruiert in seinem Werk die Dichotomie von Harmonie und Dissonanz.;The composer deconstructs in his work the dichotomy of harmony and dissonance.
Die Forschungsergebnisse haben weitreichende Implikationen für die feministische Theoriebildung.;The research findings have far-reaching implications for feminist theory formation.
Es ist anzunehmen, dass die Subjektivierungsformen sich grundlegend wandeln.;It is to be assumed that the forms of subjectivation fundamentally change.
Der Philosoph hinterfragt die cartesianische Trennung von Geist und Körper.;The philosopher questions the Cartesian separation of mind and body.
Die Maßnahmen wurden konzipiert, um hegemoniale Strukturen zu transformieren.;The measures were conceived to transform hegemonic structures.
Es ist unverkennbar, dass die ökologische Krise systemischen Charakter trägt.;It is unmistakable that the ecological crisis has a systemic character.
Der Historiker rekonstruiert die genealogischen Linien moderner Gouvernementalität.;The historian reconstructs the genealogical lines of modern governmentality.
Die Künstlerin praktiziert eine Politik der Sichtbarmachung marginalisierter Existenzen.;The artist practices a politics of making visible marginalized existences.
Es bedarf einer radikalen Demokratisierung gesellschaftlicher Entscheidungsprozesse.;A radical democratization of societal decision-making processes is needed.
Der Soziologe analysiert die Prekarisierung als Herrschaftstechnik neoliberaler Governanz.;The sociologist analyzes precarization as a technique of domination of neoliberal governance.
Die Forschung legt nahe, dass affektive Dimensionen politischer Mobilisierung zentral sind.;The research suggests that affective dimensions of political mobilization are central.
Es wäre verfehlt, die materiellen Grundlagen symbolischer Kämpfe zu ignorieren.;It would be misguided to ignore the material foundations of symbolic struggles.
Der Ökonom plädiert für eine degrowth-orientierte Transformation der Wirtschaft.;The economist advocates for a degrowth-oriented transformation of the economy.
Die Interpretation setzt eine poststrukturalistische Lektüre der Machtverhältnisse voraus.;The interpretation presupposes a poststructuralist reading of power relations.
Es ist zu befürchten, dass die sozialräumliche Segregation sich verschärft.;It is to be feared that socio-spatial segregation intensifies.
Der Architekt entwickelt Konzepte, die die Privatisierung öffentlicher Räume konterkarieren.;The architect develops concepts that counteract the privatization of public spaces.
Die Studie belegt die Intersektionalität von Diskriminierungsformen.;The study demonstrates the intersectionality of forms of discrimination.
Es liegt auf der Hand, dass emanzipatorische Projekte kollektive Organisierung erfordern.;It is obvious that emancipatory projects require collective organization.
Der Romancier dekonstruiert in seinem Werk die binären Geschlechterordnungen.;The novelist deconstructs in his work the binary gender orders.
Die Debatte offenbart die Kontingenz vermeintlich naturgegebener Kategorien.;The debate reveals the contingency of supposedly natural categories.
Es ist unbestritten, dass die Klimakrise zivilisatorische Grundlagen bedroht.;It is undisputed that the climate crisis threatens civilizational foundations.
Der Komponist praktiziert eine Ästhetik der Verweigerung gegenüber kommerziellen Verwertungslogiken.;The composer practices an aesthetics of refusal toward commercial exploitation logics.
Die Forschungsergebnisse fordern die Revision anthropozentrischer Ontologien.;The research findings demand the revision of anthropocentric ontologies.
Es wäre angebracht, subalterne Wissensformen anzuerkennen und zu valorisieren.;It would be appropriate to recognize and valorize subaltern forms of knowledge.
Der Philosoph entwickelt eine materialistische Theorie der Affekte.;The philosopher develops a materialist theory of affects.
Die Maßnahmen zielen darauf ab, die Reproduktion sozialer Ungleichheit zu durchbrechen.;The measures aim to break the reproduction of social inequality.
Es zeichnet sich eine Repolitisierung gesellschaftlicher Auseinandersetzungen ab.;A repoliticization of societal conflicts is emerging.
Der Sozialwissenschaftler untersucht die biopolitischen Dimensionen neoliberaler Regierungsrationalität.;The social scientist investigates the biopolitical dimensions of neoliberal governmental rationality.
Die Künstlergruppe interveniert mit aktivistischen Praktiken in hegemoniale Repräsentationsordnungen.;The artist group intervenes with activist practices in hegemonic representational orders.
Es ist fraglich, ob reformistische Ansätze den systemischen Charakter adressieren.;It is questionable whether reformist approaches address the systemic character.
Der Historiker analysiert die diskursiven Strategien der Naturalisierung von Herrschaft.;The historian analyzes the discursive strategies of the naturalization of domination.
Die Interpretation erfordert eine Berücksichtigung der Materialität semiotischer Prozesse.;The interpretation requires a consideration of the materiality of semiotic processes.
Es ist anzunehmen, dass antagonistische Widersprüche sich verschärfen werden.;It is to be assumed that antagonistic contradictions will intensify.
Der Ökonom entwickelt Modelle jenseits der Verwertungslogik des Kapitals.;The economist develops models beyond the valorization logic of capital.
Die Dissertation leistet einen Beitrag zur Theoretisierung von Widerstandspraktiken.;The dissertation makes a contribution to the theorization of resistance practices.
Es bedarf einer Politisierung vermeintlich technischer Fragen.;A politicization of supposedly technical questions is needed.
Der Architekt konzipiert Räume, die commons-basierte Nutzungsformen ermöglichen.;The architect conceives spaces that enable commons-based forms of use.
Die Forschung legt nahe, dass Subjektivität performativ konstituiert wird.;The research suggests that subjectivity is performatively constituted.
Es ist unerlässlich, dass die Produktionsverhältnisse grundlegend transformiert werden.;It is essential that the relations of production are fundamentally transformed.
Der Schriftsteller thematisiert die Entfremdung in spätkapitalistischen Verhältnissen.;The writer addresses alienation in late-capitalist conditions.
Die Analyse verdeutlicht die Notwendigkeit einer radikalen Infragestellung bestehender Ordnungen.;The analysis clarifies the necessity of a radical questioning of existing orders.
Es wäre illusorisch zu glauben, dass Reformen die Systemlogik überwinden.;It would be illusory to believe that reforms overcome the system logic.
Der Komponist experimentiert mit der Subversion dominanter akustischer Codes.;The composer experiments with the subversion of dominant acoustic codes.
Die Debatte offenbart die Grenzen liberaler Emanzipationsnarrative.;The debate reveals the limits of liberal emancipation narratives.
Es liegt nahe, dass die Kämpfe um Hegemonie sich intensivieren.;It is reasonable that the struggles for hegemony intensify.
Der Philosoph hinterfragt die Universalitätsansprüche westlicher Rationalität.;The philosopher questions the universality claims of Western rationality.
Die Maßnahmen wurden ergriffen, um die Akkumulationslogik zu durchbrechen.;The measures were taken to break the accumulation logic.
Es ist offenkundig, dass die Krise die Widersprüche des Systems offenlegt.;It is evident that the crisis exposes the contradictions of the system.
Der Soziologe untersucht die Klassenverhältnisse in postfordistischen Formationen.;The sociologist investigates class relations in post-Fordist formations.
Die Künstlerin praktiziert eine ästhetische Politik der Dekolonisierung.;The artist practices an aesthetic politics of decolonization.
Es ist zu erwarten, dass die subalternen Klassen sich organisieren.;It is to be expected that the subaltern classes organize themselves.
Der Historiker rekonstruiert die materialistischen Genealogien emanzipatorischer Bewegungen.;The historian reconstructs the materialist genealogies of emancipatory movements.
Die Forschungsergebnisse haben Implikationen für antikapitalistische Theoriebildung.;The research findings have implications for anti-capitalist theory formation.
Es zeichnet sich ab, dass die Legitimationskrise sich vertieft.;It is becoming apparent that the legitimation crisis deepens.
Der Ökonom plädiert für eine Vergesellschaftung der Produktionsmittel.;The economist advocates for a socialization of the means of production.
Die Interpretation setzt eine ideologiekritische Analyse voraus.;The interpretation presupposes an ideology-critical analysis.
Es wäre verfehlt, die strukturellen Zwänge kapitalistischer Vergesellschaftung auszublenden.;It would be misguided to ignore the structural constraints of capitalist socialization.
Der Architekt entwickelt Konzepte kollektiver Aneignung urbaner Räume.;The architect develops concepts of collective appropriation of urban spaces.
Die Studie dokumentiert die Intensivierung der Ausbeutung unter neoliberalen Bedingungen.;The study documents the intensification of exploitation under neoliberal conditions.
Es bedarf einer Radikalisierung der demokratischen Forderungen.;A radicalization of democratic demands is needed.
Der Romancier thematisiert die Möglichkeitsbedingungen solidarischer Lebensformen.;The novelist addresses the conditions of possibility of solidary forms of life.
Die Forschung legt nahe, dass Widerstand in die Subjektivierungsformen eingeschrieben ist.;The research suggests that resistance is inscribed in the forms of subjectivation.
Es ist anzunehmen, dass die Kämpfe um Redistribution sich verschärfen.;It is to be assumed that the struggles for redistribution intensify.
Der Komponist praktiziert eine musikalische Praxis der Entunterwerfung.;The composer practices a musical practice of de-subjugation.
Die Debatte offenbart die Notwendigkeit einer antihegemonialen Strategie.;The debate reveals the necessity of an anti-hegemonic strategy.
Es ist unbestritten, dass die Eigentumsverhältnisse grundlegend hinterfragt werden müssen.;It is undisputed that property relations must be fundamentally questioned.
Der Philosoph entwickelt eine materialistische Kritik der politischen Ökonomie.;The philosopher develops a materialist critique of political economy.
Die Maßnahmen zielen darauf ab, die Verwertungslogik zu transzendieren.;The measures aim to transcend the valorization logic.
Es liegt auf der Hand, dass emanzipatorische Transformation kollektive Praxis erfordert.;It is obvious that emancipatory transformation requires collective practice.
Der Sozialwissenschaftler analysiert die Reproduktion von Herrschaftsverhältnissen in Alltagspraktiken.;The social scientist analyzes the reproduction of relations of domination in everyday practices.
Die Künstlergruppe praktiziert eine interventionistische Kunst der Gegenhegemonie.;The artist group practices an interventionist art of counter-hegemony.
Es ist fraglich, ob gradualistische Strategien die Machtverhältnisse verschieben können.;It is questionable whether gradualist strategies can shift power relations.
Der Historiker rekonstruiert die unterdrückten Traditionen antiautoritärer Kämpfe.;The historian reconstructs the suppressed traditions of anti-authoritarian struggles.
Wäre das Brot noch warm, so schmeckte es doppelt so gut.;Were the bread still warm, it would taste twice as good.
Hätte ich den Krug nicht fallen lassen, stünde er noch auf dem Sims.;Had I not dropped the jug, it would still stand on the ledge.
Käme der Bote heute, so wüssten wir endlich Bescheid.;Were the messenger to come today, we would finally know.
Ich ginge zum Markte, wenn der Regen nur endlich nachließe.;I would go to the market if only the rain would let up at last.
Wüsste ich, wo der Schlüssel läge, so ersparte ich uns diese Mühe.;Did I know where the key lay, I would spare us this trouble.
Es wäre mir lieb, wenn du die Pforte vor Einbruch der Nacht verschlössest.;It would please me if you would lock the gate before nightfall.
Hätten wir mehr Holz gespalten, so fröre niemand in dieser Kammer.;Had we split more wood, no one would freeze in this chamber.
Ich nähme das Kleid, wenn der Preis nur billiger wäre.;I would take the dress if only the price were lower.
Bliebe der Ofen über Nacht warm, so brauchten wir am Morgen keine Glut.;Were the stove to stay warm overnight, we would need no embers in the morning.
Wäre der Weg nicht so beschwerlich, so besuchte ich sie öfter.;Were the way not so arduous, I would visit her more often.
Man täte gut daran, das Dach vor dem Winter auszubessern.;One would do well to repair the roof before winter.
Gäbe es noch Milch im Hause, so kochte ich einen Brei.;Were there still milk in the house, I would cook a porridge.
Ich schriebe ihr längst, wüsste ich nur ihre Anschrift.;I would have written to her long ago, did I but know her address.
Hätte der Schmied das Messer geschliffen, so schnitte es leichter.;Had the smith honed the knife, it would cut more easily.
Es wäre ratsam, den Vorrat bis zum Frühjahr einzuteilen.;It would be advisable to ration the supply until spring.
Käme sie zur rechten Zeit, so fände sie das Mahl noch bereitet.;Were she to come at the right time, she would find the meal still prepared.
Ich hülfe dir gern, wenn meine Hände nicht so steif wären.;I would gladly help you if my hands were not so stiff.
Wäre der Zuber nicht undicht, so trüge ich nicht ständig Wasser.;Were the tub not leaky, I would not constantly carry water.
Hätte ich es geahnt, so hätte ich niemals zugestimmt.;Had I suspected it, I would never have consented.
Man sollte den Docht kürzen, ehe er zu blaken beginnt.;One ought to trim the wick before it begins to smoke.
Es dünkte mich klug, den Handel noch heute abzuschließen.;It would seem wise to me to conclude the deal this very day.
Zöge man den Vorhang zu, so hielte die Stube die Wärme besser.;Were one to draw the curtain, the parlor would hold the warmth better.
Ich beköstigte gern den Gast, hätte ich nur mehr vorrätig.;I would gladly feed the guest, had I only more in store.
Wäre das Tuch aus Leinen, so hielte es länger als dieses.;Were the cloth of linen, it would last longer than this one.
Hätten wir früher gesät, so stünde das Korn nun höher.;Had we sown earlier, the grain would now stand taller.
Es wäre schade, wenn die Früchte im Korbe verdürben.;It would be a shame if the fruits spoiled in the basket.
Ich stiege hinauf, wenn die Leiter nicht so morsch wäre.;I would climb up if the ladder were not so rotten.
Bliebe uns noch ein wenig Öl, so brennte die Lampe bis zum Morgen.;Were a little oil left to us, the lamp would burn till morning.
Man müsste die Angeln ölen, damit die Türe nicht mehr ächzte.;One would have to oil the hinges so that the door would groan no more.
Wüsste sie, wie schwer mir dies fiele, so verlangte sie es nicht.;Did she know how hard this would be for me, she would not demand it.
Hätte der Wirt uns gewarnt, so wären wir früher aufgebrochen.;Had the innkeeper warned us, we would have set out earlier.
Es wäre mir ein Leichtes, das Bündel für dich zu tragen.;It would be an easy matter for me to carry the bundle for you.
Käme der Winter milde, so reichte das Brennholz vollauf.;Were the winter to come mild, the firewood would amply suffice.
Ich schlüge vor, dass wir bis zum Morgengrauen warteten.;I would propose that we wait until daybreak.
Wäre der Boden trockener, so ließe sich das Beet leichter umgraben.;Were the ground drier, the bed could be dug over more easily.
Hätte man den Zaun geflickt, so entwiche das Vieh nicht immerfort.;Had one mended the fence, the cattle would not constantly escape.
Es geziemte sich, dem Gaste zuerst aufzutragen.;It would be fitting to serve the guest first.
Nähme sie Vernunft an, so bliebe uns viel Verdruss erspart.;Were she to see reason, much vexation would be spared us.
Ich lüde ihn gern ein, wüsste ich nur, ob er noch weilte.;I would gladly invite him, did I but know whether he still dwelt there.
Wäre das Wetter beständiger, so hinge die Wäsche längst trocken.;Were the weather more settled, the laundry would long since hang dry.
Hätte ich nicht gezögert, so gehörte das Feld nun mir.;Had I not hesitated, the field would now be mine.
Man täte besser daran, sich in Geduld zu fassen.;One would do better to muster patience.
Es wäre unrecht, ihm die Schuld allein aufzubürden.;It would be wrong to lay the blame on him alone.
Käme Hilfe von außen, so bewältigten wir die Ernte wohl.;Were help to come from outside, we would surely manage the harvest.
Ich verwahrte das Geld sicherer, hätte ich eine feste Lade.;I would store the money more safely, had I a sturdy chest.
Wäre die Suppe nicht versalzen, so äße man sie mit Vergnügen.;Were the soup not oversalted, one would eat it with pleasure.
Hätten wir die Vorräte besser geordnet, so fänden wir alles gleich.;Had we ordered the provisions better, we would find everything at once.
Es dünkte mich billig, ihm für seine Mühe zu danken.;It would seem only fair to me to thank him for his trouble.
Löschte man das Licht, so schliefe das Kind wohl endlich ein.;Were one to extinguish the light, the child would surely fall asleep at last.
Ich risse den alten Verputz herunter, hätte ich nur die Zeit.;I would tear down the old plaster, had I but the time.
Wäre der Krug nicht gesprungen, so trüge man ihn noch zum Brunnen.;Were the jug not cracked, one would still carry it to the well.
Hätte er auf mich gehört, so stünde er heute nicht mittellos da.;Had he listened to me, he would not stand penniless today.
Man sollte die Kammer lüften, ehe die Feuchtigkeit sich festsetzte.;One ought to air the chamber before the damp settled in.
Es wäre mir recht, wenn du mir zur Hand gingest.;It would suit me if you lent me a hand.
Käme das Schiff bei Tage an, so ersparten wir uns die Fackeln.;Were the ship to arrive by day, we would spare ourselves the torches.
Ich flickte den Ärmel, wäre der Zwirn nicht so grob.;I would mend the sleeve were the thread not so coarse.
Bliebe der Sud noch länger auf dem Herde, so brennte er an.;Were the broth to stay longer on the stove, it would burn.
Hätten sie das Brot geteilt, so hungerte jetzt niemand.;Had they shared the bread, no one would be hungry now.
Es wäre klug, den Weg noch vor der Dämmerung anzutreten.;It would be wise to set out on the way before dusk.
Wüsste ich um seine Not, so schickte ich ihm alsbald Beistand.;Did I know of his distress, I would send him aid at once.
Trüge sie festere Schuhe, so ermüdete sie nicht so schnell.;Were she to wear sturdier shoes, she would not tire so quickly.
Ich verkaufte das Kalb ungern, doch die Not zwänge mich dazu.;I would sell the calf reluctantly, but need would compel me to it.
Wäre die Truhe verschlossen gewesen, so fehlte uns nichts.;Had the chest been locked, nothing would be missing.
Hätte man den Riegel vorgeschoben, so wäre der Dieb nicht eingedrungen.;Had one slid the bolt shut, the thief would not have got in.
Man müsste den Brunnen vertiefen, wollte man im Sommer Wasser haben.;One would have to deepen the well if one wanted water in summer.
Es wäre nicht schicklich, ohne Gruß vorüberzugehen.;It would not be seemly to pass by without a greeting.
Käme sie zu Besuch, so richteten wir die obere Stube her.;Were she to come visiting, we would prepare the upper room.
Ich bäte dich um nichts, hätte ich einen anderen Ausweg.;I would ask nothing of you, had I another way out.
Wäre der Winter vorüber, so sähe die Welt gleich freundlicher aus.;Were the winter over, the world would look at once friendlier.
Hätte ich den Brief eher gelesen, so wäre ich längst aufgebrochen.;Had I read the letter sooner, I would long since have departed.
Es dünkte mich vernünftig, den Handel schriftlich festzuhalten.;It would seem sensible to me to put the deal in writing.
Nähme man das Sieb, so ginge die Arbeit weit schneller vonstatten.;Were one to take the sieve, the work would proceed far more quickly.
Ich stellte den Napf hinaus, käme die Katze noch heute Nacht.;I would put the bowl out, were the cat to come tonight.
Wäre der Faden fester, so risse er nicht bei jeder Naht.;Were the thread stronger, it would not tear at every seam.
Hätten wir den Baum gefällt, so schiene nun Licht ins Fenster.;Had we felled the tree, light would now shine into the window.
Man sollte das Fass umlagern, ehe der Wein umschlüge.;One ought to move the barrel before the wine turned.
Es wäre gut, wenn du dich vor der Reise ausruhtest.;It would be good if you rested before the journey.
Käme der Frost noch einmal, so erfröre die junge Saat.;Were the frost to come once more, the young seed would freeze.
Ich beklagte mich nicht, hätte man mich nur rechtzeitig verständigt.;I would not complain, had I only been informed in time.
Wäre die Diele nicht so glatt, so stürzte sie nicht so oft.;Were the floorboard not so slippery, she would not fall so often.
Hätte ich Vorrat genug, so verschenkte ich gern die Hälfte.;Had I supply enough, I would gladly give away half.
Es wäre töricht, in solchem Wetter das Haus zu verlassen.;It would be foolish to leave the house in such weather.
Wüsste er um den Preis, so ließe er die Hand davon.;Did he know the price, he would keep his hands off it.
Zöge man das Tuch straffer, so bliebe der Tisch ordentlich gedeckt.;Were one to pull the cloth tauter, the table would stay neatly laid.
Ich löschte das Feuer, ehe ich zu Bette ginge.;I would extinguish the fire before going to bed.
Wäre der Korb größer, so trüge man alles auf einmal.;Were the basket bigger, one would carry everything at once.
Hätten wir gespart, so drückte uns die Schuld nun nicht.;Had we saved, the debt would not now weigh on us.
Man täte klug daran, dem Fremden nicht sogleich zu trauen.;One would do wisely not to trust the stranger at once.
Es wäre schön, säßen wir alle wieder an einem Tische.;It would be lovely if we all sat again at one table.
Käme Antwort aus der Stadt, so wüssten wir, woran wir wären.;Were an answer to come from town, we would know where we stood.
Ich sähe gern, dass die Kinder früher zu Bette gingen.;I would like to see the children go to bed earlier.
Wäre das Gemäuer trockener, so hielten die Vorräte länger.;Were the masonry drier, the provisions would keep longer.
Hätte man mich gefragt, so hätte ich abgeraten.;Had I been asked, I would have advised against it.
Es wäre mir angenehm, wenn du morgen früher kämest.;It would be agreeable to me if you came earlier tomorrow.
Nähme das Unwetter zu, so schlössen wir besser die Läden.;Were the storm to increase, we would do better to close the shutters.
Ich ginge selber hin, wären meine Beine nicht so schwach.;I would go myself, were my legs not so weak.
Wäre der Boden fester gestampft, so schwankte der Pfosten nicht.;Were the ground tamped firmer, the post would not sway.
Hätte sie geschwiegen, so bliebe uns dieser Ärger erspart.;Had she kept silent, this trouble would be spared us.
Man müsste die Kerzen sparen, wollte man den Winter überstehen.;One would have to ration the candles if one wanted to survive the winter.
Es wäre unbillig, ihn für unser Versäumnis zu tadeln.;It would be unfair to reproach him for our omission.
Käme der Frühling zeitig, so grünten die Wiesen bald.;Were spring to come early, the meadows would soon turn green.
Ich böte ihm gern ein Lager an, hätte ich nur Platz.;I would gladly offer him a bed, had I but room.
Wäre das Wasser klarer, so brauchte man es nicht zu sieden.;Were the water clearer, one would not need to boil it.
Hätten wir den Weg gekannt, so wären wir nicht in die Irre gegangen.;Had we known the way, we would not have gone astray.
Es dünkte mich unnötig, so viel Aufhebens davon zu machen.;It would seem unnecessary to me to make so much fuss about it.
Träte er ein, so erhöben sich alle von ihren Plätzen.;Were he to enter, all would rise from their seats.
Ich hielte es für ratsam, den Vorrat zu prüfen.;I would consider it advisable to check the supply.
Wäre die Ernte reichlicher ausgefallen, so hätten wir zu verkaufen.;Had the harvest turned out more plentiful, we would have some to sell.
Hätte ich die Wahl, so bliebe ich lieber daheim.;Had I the choice, I would rather stay at home.
Man sollte den Kessel abnehmen, ehe das Wasser überliefe.;One ought to take off the kettle before the water boiled over.
Es wäre besser gewesen, du hättest geschwiegen.;It would have been better had you kept silent.
Käme das Fuhrwerk zur Stelle, so schafften wir alles vor Abend.;Were the wagon to arrive, we would manage everything before evening.
Ich reichte dir das Salz, säßest du nicht so weit entfernt.;I would pass you the salt, did you not sit so far away.
Wäre der Zug pünktlich, so erreichten wir noch den Anschluss.;Were the train punctual, we would still catch the connection.
Hätten sie die Fenster geschlossen, so wäre der Regen nicht hereingedrungen.;Had they closed the windows, the rain would not have got in.
Es wäre mir ein Trost, wüsste ich sie in Sicherheit.;It would be a comfort to me to know her safe.
Nähme der Wind ab, so ließe sich das Feuer entfachen.;Were the wind to abate, the fire could be kindled.
Ich schnitte das Brot dünner, wollten wir länger damit auskommen.;I would cut the bread thinner if we wanted to make it last longer.
Wäre die Milch frischer, so gerönne sie nicht so rasch.;Were the milk fresher, it would not curdle so quickly.
Hätte ich das gewusst, so hätte ich mich anders entschieden.;Had I known that, I would have decided differently.
Man täte gut daran, den Kranken nicht zu stören.;One would do well not to disturb the sick man.
Es wäre schade um das gute Tuch, verdürbe man es beim Zuschnitt.;It would be a shame about the good cloth were one to ruin it in the cutting.
Käme sie zur Vernunft, so schlichtete sich der Streit von selbst.;Were she to come to her senses, the quarrel would settle itself.
Ich bäte um Aufschub, ließe sich die Sache nicht anders regeln.;I would ask for a postponement, could the matter not be settled otherwise.
Wäre der Pfad gekehrt, so rutschte niemand auf dem Eise aus.;Were the path swept, no one would slip on the ice.
Hätten wir die Schuhe geflickt, so hielten sie noch einen Winter.;Had we mended the shoes, they would last another winter.
Es dünkte mich angebracht, ihm einen Gruß zu senden.;It would seem appropriate to me to send him a greeting.
Zöge man in ein kleineres Haus, so sänken die Kosten beträchtlich.;Were one to move into a smaller house, the costs would drop considerably.
Ich verwahrte die Papiere gut, hätte ich einen sicheren Ort.;I would store the papers well, had I a safe place.
Wäre die Stube geheizt, so fröre der Gast nicht so erbärmlich.;Were the parlor heated, the guest would not freeze so wretchedly.
Hätte man die Vorräte gezählt, so wüsste man nun den Mangel.;Had one counted the provisions, one would now know the shortfall.
Man müsste den Krug ersetzen, ehe er gänzlich zerbräche.;One would have to replace the jug before it broke entirely.
Es wäre mir lieber, du bliebest über Nacht.;It would be dearer to me if you stayed the night.
Käme der Arzt noch heute, so genäse sie wohl schneller.;Were the doctor to come today, she would surely recover faster.
Ich flöchte den Korb neu, hätte ich frische Weiden.;I would weave the basket anew, had I fresh willows.
Wäre der Herd befeuert, so dampfte längst der Kessel.;Were the hearth fired, the kettle would long since be steaming.
Hätten wir mehr Hände, so wäre die Arbeit rascher getan.;Had we more hands, the work would be done more swiftly.
Es wäre unklug, den Vorrat vorzeitig aufzubrauchen.;It would be unwise to use up the supply prematurely.
Nähme sie das Angebot an, so änderte sich manches zum Guten.;Were she to accept the offer, much would change for the better.
Ich stünde früher auf, wäre die Nacht nicht so kurz.;I would rise earlier, were the night not so short.
Wäre das Fenster dicht, so pfiffe der Wind nicht herein.;Were the window sealed, the wind would not whistle in.
Hätte er sich beeilt, so träfe er die Fähre noch an.;Had he hurried, he would still catch the ferry.
Man sollte das Dach decken, ehe der Herbst hereinbräche.;One ought to roof the house before autumn set in.
Es wäre ein Segen, gäbe es endlich Regen.;It would be a blessing if there were finally rain.
Käme ein guter Preis zustande, so verkauften wir sogleich.;Were a good price to come about, we would sell at once.
Ich sagte nichts, wüsste ich nicht, dass es dich beträfe.;I would say nothing, did I not know that it concerned you.
Wäre der Kessel größer, so kochte man für alle auf einmal.;Were the kettle bigger, one would cook for all at once.
Hätten wir Vorsorge getroffen, so stünden wir jetzt besser da.;Had we made provision, we would stand better now.
Es dünkte mich müßig, darüber noch länger zu streiten.;It would seem futile to me to quarrel over it any longer.
Träte Besserung ein, so ließen wir sogleich Nachricht zukommen.;Were improvement to set in, we would send word at once.
Ich hütete die Kinder gern, hätte ich nicht das Feld zu bestellen.;I would gladly mind the children, had I not the field to tend.
Wäre die Ware unversehrt, so nähme man sie ohne Weiteres an.;Were the goods undamaged, one would accept them without further ado.
Hätte ich einen Wagen, so führe ich dich zur Stadt.;Had I a cart, I would drive you to town.
Man täte wohl daran, die Rechnung nochmals zu prüfen.;One would do well to check the bill once more.
Es wäre eine Schande, das gute Essen verderben zu lassen.;It would be a disgrace to let the good food spoil.
Käme der Schnee früher, so bliebe die Saat geschützt.;Were the snow to come earlier, the seed would remain protected.
Ich schriebe längst zurück, hätte ich nur Papier im Hause.;I would have written back long ago, had I but paper in the house.
Wäre der Zaun höher, so entwiche das Federvieh nicht.;Were the fence higher, the poultry would not escape.
Hätten sie beizeiten gewarnt, so wären wir vorbereitet gewesen.;Had they warned in good time, we would have been prepared.
Es wäre mir eine Last, ihm dies mitteilen zu müssen.;It would be a burden to me to have to tell him this.
Nähme man das Pferd, so wäre man vor Mittag zurück.;Were one to take the horse, one would be back before noon.
Ich äße gern etwas Warmes, wäre der Herd nur befeuert.;I would gladly eat something warm, were the hearth but fired.
Wäre der Weg gepflastert, so käme man auch bei Regen durch.;Were the road paved, one would get through even in rain.
Hätte ich es vermocht, so hätte ich ihm Beistand geleistet.;Had I been able, I would have given him assistance.
Man müsste sparsamer wirtschaften, wollte man über den Winter kommen.;One would have to manage more frugally to get through the winter.
Es wäre nicht recht, ihn in dieser Lage allein zu lassen.;It would not be right to leave him alone in this situation.
Käme sie noch heute, so richtete ich das Nachtlager her.;Were she to come today, I would prepare the bed.
Ich verhandelte selbst, wäre ich der Sprache mächtig.;I would negotiate myself, were I master of the language.
Wäre die Stube größer, so lüde ich mehr Gäste.;Were the parlor bigger, I would invite more guests.
Hätten wir Salz genug, so pökelten wir das Fleisch.;Had we salt enough, we would salt the meat.
Es dünkte mich geraten, den Streit auf sich beruhen zu lassen.;It would seem advisable to me to let the quarrel rest.
Zöge man die Schuhe aus, so bliebe die Diele sauber.;Were one to take off one's shoes, the floorboards would stay clean.
Ich weckte dich nicht, schliefest du nur endlich fest.;I would not wake you, were you but finally sleeping soundly.
Wäre das Wetter beständig, so schnitte man morgen das Gras.;Were the weather settled, one would cut the grass tomorrow.
Hätte man den Sack besser verschnürt, so ginge nichts verloren.;Had one tied the sack better, nothing would be lost.
Man sollte den Gast nicht warten lassen, wäre es auch noch so spät.;One ought not to keep the guest waiting, be it ever so late.
Es wäre mir eine Freude, dich wieder bei uns zu sehen.;It would be a joy to me to see you with us again.
Käme das Geld beizeiten, so beglichen wir alle Schulden.;Were the money to come in good time, we would settle all debts.
Ich vertraute ihm die Sache an, wäre er nur verschwiegener.;I would entrust the matter to him, were he only more discreet.
Wäre die Ernte eingebracht, so ruhten wir uns endlich aus.;Were the harvest brought in, we would finally rest.
Hätten wir den Rat befolgt, so ginge es uns heute besser.;Had we followed the advice, we would be better off today.
Es wäre gescheit, sich beizeiten nach Ersatz umzusehen.;It would be sensible to look for a replacement in good time.
Nähme die Kälte ab, so öffnete man wieder die Läden.;Were the cold to lessen, one would open the shutters again.
Ich bliebe gern noch, drängte die Zeit nicht so sehr.;I would gladly stay longer, did time not press so.
Wäre der Napf gefüllt, so bettelte der Hund nicht so.;Were the bowl filled, the dog would not beg so.
Hätte ich es geahnt, so hätte ich früher Vorsorge getroffen.;Had I foreseen it, I would have made provision earlier.
Man täte gut, den Brief zu versiegeln, ehe man ihn absendete.;One would do well to seal the letter before sending it off.
Es wäre grausam, das Tier bei diesem Wetter draußen zu lassen.;It would be cruel to leave the animal outside in this weather.
Käme sie zur Einsicht, so verzieh man ihr alles.;Were she to come to her senses, all would be forgiven her.
Ich richtete das Mahl früher, wüsste ich um deine Ankunft.;I would prepare the meal earlier, did I know of your arrival.
Wäre die Tür geölt, so hörte niemand mein Kommen.;Were the door oiled, no one would hear my coming.
Hätten wir uns beeilt, so säßen wir jetzt im Trockenen.;Had we hurried, we would now sit in the dry.
Es dünkte mich verkehrt, ihm dies zu verschweigen.;It would seem wrong to me to conceal this from him.
Träte Ruhe ein, so genäse der Kranke wohl schneller.;Were quiet to set in, the sick man would surely recover faster.
Ich zahlte gern mehr, wäre die Ware nur haltbarer.;I would gladly pay more, were the goods only more durable.
Wäre der Krug voll, so brauchte niemand zum Brunnen zu gehen.;Were the jug full, no one would need to go to the well.
Hätte man mir vertraut, so wäre alles anders gekommen.;Had one trusted me, everything would have turned out differently.
Man müsste die Kammer räumen, wollte man den Gast beherbergen.;One would have to clear the chamber if one wanted to lodge the guest.
Es wäre höflich, ihm zumindest zu antworten.;It would be polite at least to answer him.
Käme der Sommer trocken, so litte das Vieh unter Durst.;Were the summer to come dry, the cattle would suffer from thirst.
Ich löste die Knoten, hätte ich nur geschicktere Finger.;I would undo the knots, had I but nimbler fingers.
Wäre der Herd sauber, so kochte es sich weit angenehmer.;Were the hearth clean, cooking would be far more pleasant.
Hätten wir Feuer geschlagen, so wären wir längst gewärmt.;Had we struck fire, we would long since be warmed.
Es wäre unverzeihlich, den Termin abermals zu versäumen.;It would be unforgivable to miss the appointment yet again.
Nähme er Vernunft an, so ersparte er uns viel Kummer.;Were he to see reason, he would spare us much grief.
Ich säte lieber später, drohte nicht noch einmal Frost.;I would rather sow later, were frost not threatening once more.
Wäre die Nacht heller, so fände man den Pfad ohne Mühe.;Were the night brighter, one would find the path without trouble.
Hätte ich mehr Zeit, so besserte ich das Dach eigenhändig aus.;Had I more time, I would repair the roof with my own hands.
Man sollte das Vieh tränken, ehe die Sonne höher stiege.;One ought to water the cattle before the sun rose higher.
Es wäre mir lieb, wenn wir uns bald wiedersähen.;It would be dear to me if we saw each other again soon.
Der Regen fiel drei Tage lang, ehe die Straße wieder trocken war.;The rain fell for three days before the road was dry again.
Sie hängte den Mantel über den Stuhl und setzte sich ans Feuer.;She hung the coat over the chair and sat down by the fire.
Mein Vater trug den Schlüssel bis zu seinem Tod bei sich.;My father carried the key with him until his death.
Der Bäcker öffnete den Laden, ehe es hell wurde.;The baker opened the shop before it grew light.
Man brachte die Kranke in die untere Stube.;The sick woman was brought into the lower room.
Hätten wir die Fenster geschlossen, so wäre das Wasser nicht eingedrungen.;Had we closed the windows, the water would not have got in.
Sie schnitt das Brot in dünne Scheiben und legte es auf den Teller.;She cut the bread into thin slices and laid it on the plate.
Der Hund lag vor der Tür und wartete auf seinen Herrn.;The dog lay before the door and waited for its master.
Die Uhr im Flur ging seit Jahren zwei Minuten nach.;The clock in the hallway had been two minutes slow for years.
Er zählte das Geld noch einmal, ehe er es einsteckte.;He counted the money once more before he pocketed it.
Der Winter kam früh in jenem Jahr.;The winter came early that year.
Sie schrieb ihm jeden Sonntag, doch er antwortete selten.;She wrote to him every Sunday, but he seldom answered.
Man verkaufte das Haus, weil niemand darin wohnen wollte.;The house was sold because no one wanted to live in it.
Der Knecht trug das Heu in die Scheune, ehe der Regen einsetzte.;The farmhand carried the hay into the barn before the rain set in.
Wäre der Arzt früher gekommen, so lebte das Kind noch.;Had the doctor come earlier, the child would still be alive.
Der Recke schwur seiner Herrin ewige Treue, ehe er in den Kampf zog.;The warrior swore eternal fidelity to his lady before he went into battle.
Wonne durchströmte ihr Herz, als sie den Geliebten endlich wiedersah.;Bliss flowed through her heart when she finally saw her beloved again.
Ein schwerer Fluch lastete auf dem geraubten Golde.;A heavy curse weighed upon the stolen gold.
Die Kunde von seinem Tode drang bis in die fernsten Gaue.;The tidings of his death reached the most distant regions.
Sehnsucht nach der Heimat verzehrte den einsamen Wanderer.;Longing for home consumed the lonely wanderer.
Sie sang von Minne und von herbem Leid.;She sang of courtly love and of bitter sorrow.
Der Held ergriff die Waffe, die kein Sterblicher zu führen wagte.;The hero seized the weapon that no mortal dared to wield.
Weihe umfing den heiligen Hain in der Dämmerstunde.;Consecration enveloped the sacred grove at the twilight hour.
Sein Sinnen und Trachten galt allein der Rache.;His thoughts and strivings were devoted to vengeance alone.
Die Maid entbot dem Fremdling freundlichen Gruß.;The maiden offered the stranger a friendly greeting.
Aus dunklen Tiefen stieg ein grauenvolles Raunen empor.;From dark depths rose a dreadful murmuring.
Der greise König sann über sein verwirktes Erbe.;The aged king brooded over his forfeited inheritance.
Sie floh in die Wildnis, wo kein Auge sie erspähte.;She fled into the wilderness where no eye espied her.
Die Götter beschlossen den Untergang ihres eigenen Geschlechts.;The gods decreed the downfall of their own race.
Sein Gemüt war von Wehmut und banger Ahnung erfüllt.;His spirit was filled with melancholy and anxious foreboding.
Der Schwur band ihn fester als jede irdische Fessel.;The oath bound him tighter than any earthly fetter.
Rasend vor Zorn erhob der Riese seine gewaltige Faust.;Raging with wrath, the giant raised his mighty fist.
Ihm ward verkündet, dass kein Trank die Wunde heilen könne.;It was proclaimed to him that no potion could heal the wound.
Der Wanderer nahte dem Felsen, den lodernde Flammen umschlossen.;The wanderer approached the rock encircled by blazing flames.
Sie wähnte sich sicher, doch das Verhängnis nahte unaufhaltsam.;She imagined herself safe, yet doom approached unstoppably.
In seinem Blicke las sie das nahe Verderben.;In his gaze she read the imminent ruin.
Der Schmied härtete das Schwert in Blut und Feuer.;The smith tempered the sword in blood and fire.
Kein Sterblicher vermochte des Zaubers Bann zu brechen.;No mortal was able to break the spell's enchantment.
Sein Vater fiel in ferner Schlacht durch heimtückischen Speer.;His father fell in a distant battle by a treacherous spear.
Der Trank entfachte eine Glut, die kein Verstand mehr zügelte.;The potion kindled an ardor that no reason could restrain.
Sie erwachte aus langem Schlummer, den ein Gott ihr auferlegt hatte.;She awoke from a long slumber that a god had imposed upon her.
Der Vertrag stand in Runen auf dem Schaft des Speers.;The covenant stood in runes upon the shaft of the spear.
Trug und Falschheit zerstörten das einst so feste Bündnis.;Deceit and falsehood destroyed the once so firm alliance.
Er ward gewahr, dass sein eigen Blut ihn verraten hatte.;He became aware that his own blood had betrayed him.
Die Nornen spannen den Faden des unabwendbaren Schicksals.;The Norns spun the thread of inescapable fate.
Der Jüngling kannte weder Furcht noch bange Zagheit.;The youth knew neither fear nor timid faintheartedness.
Ihr Klagen hallte durch die menschenleeren Hallen.;Her lamentation echoed through the deserted halls.
Aus Liebesnot entsprang die schwerste aller Sünden.;From love's anguish sprang the gravest of all sins.
Der Schatz ruhte unberührt im Grunde des Stromes.;The treasure rested untouched at the bottom of the river.
Sein Gelübde zwang ihn, die Heimstatt für immer zu meiden.;His vow compelled him to shun his homestead forever.
Die Walküre trotzte dem Gebot ihres gewaltigen Vaters.;The Valkyrie defied the command of her mighty father.
Reue erfüllte ihn erst, als die Tat unwiderruflich vollbracht war.;Remorse filled him only when the deed was irrevocably done.
Er zog gen Osten, wo die Sonne über Bergen aufging.;He journeyed eastward, where the sun rose over the mountains.
Kein Auge durfte den geweihten Kelch erblicken.;No eye was permitted to behold the consecrated chalice.
Sie kürte ihn zum Gemahl vor allem Volk.;She chose him as her consort before all the people.
Der Nebel wich, und das Burgtor ward sichtbar.;The mist receded, and the castle gate became visible.
Sein Herz erbebte, als er die vertraute Weise vernahm.;His heart trembled when he heard the familiar melody.
Die alte Wunde brach in jener Nacht aufs Neue auf.;The old wound broke open anew that night.
Er entsagte der Welt und suchte Buße in der Einsamkeit.;He renounced the world and sought penance in solitude.
Dem Frevler ward kein Erbarmen zuteil.;No mercy was granted to the transgressor.
Ihre Stimme lockte die Schiffer in den sicheren Untergang.;Her voice lured the mariners to certain destruction.
Der Held erschlug den Wurm, der den Hort bewachte.;The hero slew the dragon that guarded the hoard.
Vermessenheit stürzte ihn in bodenloses Elend.;Presumption plunged him into bottomless misery.
Kein Sang und kein Gebet vermochte den Zorn zu besänftigen.;No song and no prayer could appease the wrath.
Die Sippe verstieß ihn wegen seiner unerhörten Tat.;The kin cast him out because of his outrageous deed.
Er ahnte nicht, wessen Blut in seinen Adern floss.;He did not suspect whose blood flowed in his veins.
Das Wonnemeer der Liebe verschlang beider Sinne.;The blissful sea of love engulfed the senses of both.
Der Speer zerbarst, und mit ihm zerfiel alle Macht.;The spear shattered, and with it all power crumbled.
Sie harrte am Fenster, bis das Segel am Horizont erschien.;She waited at the window until the sail appeared on the horizon.
Aus Mitleid erwuchs ihm die höchste Erkenntnis.;From compassion the highest knowledge grew within him.
Die Flammen loderten empor und verzehrten die Halle der Götter.;The flames blazed up and consumed the hall of the gods.
Er ward zum Wanderer, dem keine Heimat mehr blieb.;He became a wanderer, to whom no homeland remained.
Ihr Sehnen galt einem Manne, den sie nie erblickt hatte.;Her yearning was for a man she had never beheld.
Der Schleier fiel, und die Wahrheit trat schonungslos hervor.;The veil fell, and the truth emerged mercilessly.
Verhängnisvoll ward jener Tag für alle Geschlechter.;That day became fateful for all the races.
Er schwang das Horn und rief die Getreuen zusammen.;He raised the horn and called the loyal ones together.
Kein Gold der Welt vermochte den Verlust aufzuwiegen.;No gold in the world could outweigh the loss.
Die Nacht barg, was der Tag nicht ertragen konnte.;The night sheltered what the day could not bear.
Er trank und vergaß, wer er zuvor gewesen war.;He drank and forgot who he had been before.
Am Grabe der Mutter gelobte er strenge Rache.;At his mother's grave he vowed stern vengeance.
Die Botschaft kam zu spät, um das Unheil zu wenden.;The message came too late to avert the calamity.
Sein Weib beklagte ihn mit herzzerreißender Klage.;His wife mourned him with heartrending lamentation.
Der Ring kehrte zurück, woher er einst geraubt ward.;The ring returned whence it had once been stolen.
Erlösung ward dem Verfluchten durch treue Liebe zuteil.;Redemption was granted to the cursed one through faithful love.
Die Dämmerung sank über die Welt der Unsterblichen.;Twilight descended over the world of the immortals.
Er verschmähte den Thron, den man ihm bereitwillig bot.;He spurned the throne that was readily offered to him.
Ihre Tränen benetzten das kalte Antlitz des Gefallenen.;Her tears moistened the cold countenance of the fallen one.
Kein Zauber und kein Trug bestanden vor dem reinen Herzen.;No magic and no deceit prevailed against the pure heart.
Das Schweigen wog schwerer als jedes gesprochene Wort.;The silence weighed heavier than any spoken word.
Er ritt durch Feuer, das keinen Feigen durchließ.;He rode through fire that let no coward pass.
Die Weissagung erfüllte sich, wie es verkündet war.;The prophecy fulfilled itself as it had been foretold.
Sie erkannte im Fremden den lang ersehnten Retter.;She recognized in the stranger the long-awaited savior.
Sein Stolz verwehrte ihm jedes Wort der Versöhnung.;His pride denied him any word of reconciliation.
Der Wald raunte von Taten längst vergangener Zeiten.;The forest murmured of deeds of long-past ages.
Man bettete ihn auf Schilde und trug ihn zum Scheiterhaufen.;They laid him upon shields and bore him to the pyre.
Was er begehrte, war ihm auf ewig versagt.;What he desired was denied him for all eternity.
Die Türangel quietschte, sooft jemand den Dachboden betrat.;The door hinge squeaked whenever someone entered the attic.
Der Wetterhahn auf dem Firstbalken drehte sich träge im Abendwind.;The weathervane on the ridge beam turned sluggishly in the evening wind.
Sie schöpfte das Wasser mit einer Kelle aus dem irdenen Krug.;She ladled the water from the earthenware jug with a dipper.
In der Truhe lagen vergilbte Briefe unter einer wollenen Decke.;In the chest lay yellowed letters beneath a woolen blanket.
Der Docht der Petroleumlampe war längst verkohlt.;The wick of the kerosene lamp had long since charred.
Ein rostiger Riegel versperrte die Kellerluke von innen.;A rusty bolt barred the cellar hatch from the inside.
Auf dem Sims stand ein angeschlagener Tonkrug voller Trockenblumen.;On the ledge stood a chipped clay jug full of dried flowers.
Die Dachrinne war von altem Laub vollständig verstopft.;The gutter was completely clogged with old leaves.
Er hängte den Mantel an den Haken neben dem Türpfosten.;He hung the coat on the hook beside the doorpost.
Der Mörser aus Marmor stand seit Jahrzehnten unbenutzt im Schrank.;The marble mortar had stood unused in the cupboard for decades.
Sie stopfte den Riss im Ärmel mit grobem Zwirn.;She darned the tear in the sleeve with coarse thread.
Ein zerschlissener Läufer bedeckte die knarrende Diele.;A threadbare runner covered the creaking floorboard.
Der Zapfhahn am Fass tropfte unaufhörlich.;The tap on the barrel dripped incessantly.
Auf der Anrichte lagen ein Wetzstein und ein stumpfes Messer.;On the sideboard lay a whetstone and a dull knife.
Die Klinke ließ sich nur mit erheblichem Kraftaufwand herunterdrücken.;The door handle could only be pressed down with considerable effort.
Er füllte den Eimer am Brunnen und trug ihn schwerfällig hinauf.;He filled the bucket at the well and carried it up laboriously.
Der Schemel wackelte, weil ein Bein zu kurz geraten war.;The stool wobbled because one leg had turned out too short.
Sie wickelte das Brot in ein sauberes Leinentuch.;She wrapped the bread in a clean linen cloth.
Im Verschlag hinter dem Haus lagerte man das Brennholz.;Firewood was stored in the shed behind the house.
Die Scharniere des Fensterladens bedurften dringend einer Ölung.;The shutter's hinges urgently needed oiling.
Auf dem Herd stand ein gusseiserner Topf mit angesetztem Sud.;On the stove stood a cast-iron pot with a simmering broth.
Er zog den Korken mit einem dumpfen Knall aus dem Flaschenhals.;He pulled the cork out of the bottleneck with a dull pop.
Die Kufen des alten Schlittens waren völlig verrostet.;The runners of the old sled were completely rusted.
Sie glättete die Falten des Tischtuchs mit flacher Hand.;She smoothed the creases of the tablecloth with a flat hand.
Ein schmiedeeisernes Gitter schützte den Vorgarten vor Eindringlingen.;A wrought-iron grate protected the front garden from intruders.
Der Wasserkessel pfiff schrill auf der heißen Herdplatte.;The kettle whistled shrilly on the hot stovetop.
Im Spind hingen die Arbeitskittel ordentlich nebeneinander.;In the locker, the work smocks hung neatly side by side.
Sie schnitt den Faden mit einer winzigen Nagelschere ab.;She cut the thread with a tiny pair of nail scissors.
Der Fensterrahmen war an mehreren Stellen aufgequollen.;The window frame had swollen in several places.
Auf dem Speicher stapelten sich staubige Kisten und leere Rahmen.;In the loft, dusty crates and empty frames were piled up.
Er stellte den Stiefelknecht neben die Fußmatte.;He placed the bootjack beside the doormat.
Der Schöpflöffel hing an einem Nagel über der Spüle.;The ladle hung on a nail above the sink.
Die Zinken der Gabel waren vom langen Gebrauch verbogen.;The tines of the fork were bent from long use.
Sie füllte die Vorratsdose bis zum Rand mit Grieß.;She filled the storage tin to the brim with semolina.
Ein grober Besen lehnte in der Ecke der Diele.;A coarse broom leaned in the corner of the hallway.
Der Sockel der Stehlampe war aus massivem Messing gefertigt.;The base of the floor lamp was made of solid brass.
Er befestigte das Brett mit vier langen Schrauben an der Wand.;He fastened the board to the wall with four long screws.
Die Kanne stand auf einem geflochtenen Untersetzer.;The pot stood on a woven trivet.
Im Regal reihten sich Einmachgläser mit verblassten Etiketten.;On the shelf, preserving jars with faded labels stood in rows.
Sie strich die Krümel mit dem Handrücken vom Wachstuch.;She brushed the crumbs off the oilcloth with the back of her hand.
Der Dachfirst musste nach dem Sturm ausgebessert werden.;The roof ridge had to be repaired after the storm.
Ein schmaler Spalt klaffte zwischen Schwelle und Tür.;A narrow gap yawned between the threshold and the door.
Er goss den Rest der Brühe in eine Emailleschüssel.;He poured the rest of the broth into an enamel bowl.
Das Sieb hing an einer Kordel neben dem Ausguss.;The sieve hung on a cord beside the drain.
Die Schublade klemmte, seit die Feuchtigkeit ins Holz gezogen war.;The drawer stuck ever since the moisture had seeped into the wood.
Auf dem Nachtkästchen lag eine abgegriffene Brille.;On the nightstand lay a worn pair of glasses.
Sie hängte die Wäsche mit hölzernen Klammern an die Leine.;She hung the laundry on the line with wooden pegs.
Der Griff des Kessels war mit einem Lappen umwickelt.;The kettle's handle was wrapped with a rag.
Ein bröckelnder Verputz löste sich von der Kellerwand.;Crumbling plaster peeled off the cellar wall.
Er schob den Riegel vor und löschte die Kerze.;He slid the bolt shut and extinguished the candle.
Der Kamm lag zwischen Haarnadeln auf der Kommode.;The comb lay among hairpins on the dresser.
Sie schüttelte den Läufer kräftig über dem Geländer aus.;She shook the runner vigorously over the railing.
Das Scharnier der Brille war mit Draht notdürftig geflickt.;The glasses' hinge was crudely patched with wire.
Auf der Fensterbank welkten die Kräuter im Blumentopf.;On the windowsill, the herbs in the flowerpot were wilting.
Der Schürhaken stand neben dem erloschenen Ofen.;The poker stood beside the extinguished stove.
Ein Wasserfleck breitete sich an der Zimmerdecke aus.;A water stain spread across the ceiling.
Sie band die Schürze mit einer festen Schleife im Rücken.;She tied the apron with a firm bow at her back.
Der Reisigbesen taugte nur noch für den Hof.;The twig broom was only good for the yard anymore.
Er ölte das quietschende Gelenk der Schere.;He oiled the squeaking joint of the scissors.
Im Weidenkorb lagen Zwiebeln und schrumpelige Kartoffeln.;In the wicker basket lay onions and shriveled potatoes.
Die Zarge der Tür war von Holzwürmern durchsetzt.;The door frame was riddled with woodworms.
Sie stellte die Milchkanne auf die kühle Steinplatte.;She placed the milk can on the cool stone slab.
Der Rost über der Glut war mit Fett verkrustet.;The grate over the embers was encrusted with grease.
Ein zersprungener Spiegel hing schief über dem Waschbecken.;A cracked mirror hung crooked above the washbasin.
Er wischte den Staub vom Kerzenleuchter aus Zinn.;He wiped the dust from the pewter candlestick.
Die Borsten der Bürste waren fast vollständig abgenutzt.;The bristles of the brush were almost completely worn down.
Auf dem Dachboden roch es nach Mottenkugeln und altem Papier.;The attic smelled of mothballs and old paper.
Sie hob den Deckel und rührte den Sud gemächlich um.;She lifted the lid and stirred the broth leisurely.
Der Trichter erleichterte das Umfüllen des Öls erheblich.;The funnel made pouring the oil considerably easier.
Ein Sprung zog sich quer durch die Kachel am Ofen.;A crack ran across the tile on the stove.
Er hängte den Schlüsselbund an den Nagel im Flur.;He hung the keyring on the nail in the hallway.
Die Nähmaschine stand verhüllt unter einem Leinentuch.;The sewing machine stood covered under a linen cloth.
Sie füllte die Wärmflasche und schob sie unters Bettzeug.;She filled the hot-water bottle and pushed it under the bedding.
Der Zwirn riss, kaum dass sie die Naht zusammenzog.;The thread tore as soon as she pulled the seam together.
Ein Kratzer verlief quer über die polierte Tischplatte.;A scratch ran across the polished tabletop.
Auf dem Bord standen Gewürzdosen aus geschwärztem Blech.;On the shelf stood spice tins of blackened tin.
Er stützte das Regal mit einem Keil aus Hartholz ab.;He propped up the shelf with a hardwood wedge.
Die Schnalle des Riemens war vom Rost angefressen.;The buckle of the strap was corroded by rust.
Sie rieb das Silber mit einem weichen Tuch blank.;She rubbed the silver bright with a soft cloth.
Der Bodenbelag löste sich an mehreren Stellen vom Estrich.;The floor covering was peeling off the screed in several places.
Ein Kienspan diente ihm als notdürftige Lichtquelle.;A pine splinter served him as a makeshift light source.
Die Ösen des Schuhs waren allesamt ausgerissen.;The eyelets of the shoe had all torn out.
Er goss das Regenwasser aus der Tonne über die Beete.;He poured the rainwater from the barrel over the flowerbeds.
Auf dem Waschbrett schrubbte sie die grauen Laken.;On the washboard she scrubbed the gray sheets.
Der Kachelofen strahlte behagliche Wärme in die Stube.;The tiled stove radiated cozy warmth into the parlor.
Ein Hobel und mehrere Feilen lagen auf der Werkbank.;A plane and several files lay on the workbench.
Sie fädelte den Faden mühsam durch das winzige Nadelöhr.;She threaded the thread laboriously through the tiny needle eye.
Der Kittel hing zerknittert über der Stuhllehne.;The smock hung wrinkled over the chair back.
Die Speisekammer war bis unter die Decke gefüllt.;The pantry was filled to the ceiling.
Er schnitt den Zwiebelstrunk mit dem Küchenbeil ab.;He cut off the onion stalk with the kitchen cleaver.
Ein Stück Bindfaden hielt das Paket notdürftig zusammen.;A piece of twine held the parcel together makeshift.
Die Fensterscheibe war von Fliegendreck getrübt.;The windowpane was clouded with fly specks.
Sie legte den Deckel auf die Kanne und trug sie hinaus.;She placed the lid on the pot and carried it out.
Das Fußbrett des Bettes war aus dunkler Eiche geschnitzt.;The footboard of the bed was carved from dark oak.
Der Wischlappen hing über dem Rand des Zubers.;The rag hung over the edge of the tub.
Ein verbeulter Napf stand vor der Hütte des Hofhundes.;A dented bowl stood in front of the yard dog's kennel.
Er schliff die Klinge sorgfältig am Schleifstein.;He carefully honed the blade on the grindstone.
Die Latten des Zauns wiesen deutliche Wetterschäden auf.;The slats of the fence showed clear weather damage.
Sie verstaute die Vorräte in einem geflochtenen Korb.;She stowed the provisions in a woven basket.
Der Ofenschieber ließ sich kaum noch bewegen.;The stove damper could hardly be moved anymore.
Now maybe more older and high elevated language and older style, but still german.
Auf dem Sims ruhte ein irdener Krug, dessen Henkel längst zersprungen war.;On the ledge rested an earthen jug whose handle had long since cracked.
Der Kienspan warf sein flackernd Licht wider die getünchte Wand.;The pine splinter cast its flickering light against the whitewashed wall.
Im Gemache herrschte jene Stille, die nur alte Häuser zu bergen vermögen.;In the chamber reigned that stillness which only old houses are able to harbor.
Sie schöpfte des Wassers mit hölzerner Kelle aus dem Zuber.;She drew water with a wooden ladle from the tub.
Der Riegel der Kammertür war von Rost zerfressen.;The bolt of the chamber door was eaten away by rust.
Ein muffiger Hauch entstieg der geöffneten Truhe.;A musty breath issued from the opened chest.
Auf der Anrichte standen zinnerne Becher in ordentlicher Reihe.;On the sideboard stood pewter cups in an orderly row.
Des Wetterhahns Ächzen kündete den nahenden Sturm an.;The weathervane's groaning announced the approaching storm.
Sie barg das Brot in einem Tuche von grobem Linnen.;She wrapped the bread in a cloth of coarse linen.
Der Estrich war an manchen Stellen aufgebrochen und uneben.;The floor was broken open and uneven in some places.
Ein schwerer Vorhang verhüllte das Fenster gen Norden.;A heavy curtain veiled the window facing north.
Im Winkel der Stube lehnte ein Besen aus dürrem Reisig.;In the corner of the parlor leaned a broom of dry brushwood.
Der Docht war niedergebrannt, ehe die Nacht zur Neige ging.;The wick had burned down before the night came to an end.
Auf dem Herde brodelte ein Sud in eisernem Kessel.;On the hearth a broth bubbled in an iron kettle.
Sie glättete des Tischtuchs Falten mit sorgsamer Hand.;She smoothed the tablecloth's creases with a careful hand.
Der Dachstuhl ächzte unter der Last des feuchten Schnees.;The roof truss groaned under the weight of the wet snow.
Vergilbtes Schriftwerk lag in der Lade des Schreibpults.;Yellowed writings lay in the drawer of the writing desk.
Ein Zuber voll Regenwassers stand unterhalb der Traufe.;A tub full of rainwater stood beneath the eaves.
Der Schemel, auf dem sie saß, war von vielem Gebrauch blank geworden.;The stool on which she sat had grown smooth from much use.
Die Angeln der Pforte bedurften seit Jahren des Öles.;The gate's hinges had needed oil for years.
Sie entzündete das Talglicht und trat in den Flur hinaus.;She lit the tallow candle and stepped out into the hallway.
Auf dem Gesims verwelkten Kräuter in tönernen Töpfen.;On the ledge, herbs withered in clay pots.
Der Schlüsselbund hing an einem Nagel neben dem Türgericht.;The keyring hung on a nail beside the door frame.
Ein Sprung zog sich quer durch die geblümte Kachel.;A crack ran across the flowered tile.
Sie stopfte den Riss im Ärmel mit gröbstem Zwirne.;She darned the tear in the sleeve with the coarsest thread.
Des Kellers Luft war feucht und roch nach Erde.;The cellar's air was damp and smelled of earth.
Der Zapfhahn am Fasse tropfte in unregelmäßigen Abständen.;The tap on the barrel dripped at irregular intervals.
Auf dem Speicher lagerten Kisten voll unnützen Hausrats.;In the loft were stored crates full of useless household goods.
Ein zerschlissener Läufer bedeckte die knarrenden Dielen.;A threadbare runner covered the creaking floorboards.
Sie hing die Wäsche mit hölzernen Klammern an die Leine.;She hung the laundry on the line with wooden pegs.
Der Mörser von Marmor war ein Erbstück ihrer Mutter.;The marble mortar was an heirloom from her mother.
Das Schloss der Truhe ließ sich nur mit Mühe bewegen.;The chest's lock could only be moved with difficulty.
Ein blakendes Licht erhellte kaum die Nische im Gemäuer.;A smoking light barely illuminated the niche in the masonry.
Sie schüttete die Asche in einen bereitstehenden Eimer.;She poured the ashes into a waiting bucket.
Der Wetzstein lag neben dem stumpf gewordenen Messer.;The whetstone lay beside the knife that had grown dull.
Über der Spüle hing der Schöpflöffel an rostigem Haken.;Above the sink hung the ladle on a rusty hook.
Im Verschlage hinter dem Hause lagerte das Brennholz.;In the shed behind the house the firewood was stored.
Ein Wasserfleck breitete sich langsam über die Decke aus.;A water stain slowly spread across the ceiling.
Der Kachelofen spendete behagliche Wärme bis in den Morgen.;The tiled stove gave off cozy warmth until morning.
Sie strich die Krümel mit dem Handrücken vom Wachstuch.;She brushed the crumbs off the oilcloth with the back of her hand.
Des Fensterrahmens Holz war von Feuchtigkeit aufgequollen.;The window frame's wood had swollen from moisture.
Ein schmiedeeisernes Gitter umschloss den kleinen Vorgarten.;A wrought-iron grate enclosed the small front garden.
Sie legte den Deckel auf die Kanne und trug sie hinweg.;She placed the lid on the pot and carried it away.
Der Schürhaken stand neben dem erkalteten Ofen.;The poker stood beside the cooled stove.
Auf dem Nachtkästchen ruhte eine abgegriffene Brille.;On the nightstand rested a worn pair of glasses.
Ein Trichter erleichterte das Umfüllen des Öles beträchtlich.;A funnel considerably eased the pouring of the oil.
Sie fädelte den Faden mühsam durch das winzige Nadelöhr.;She threaded the thread laboriously through the tiny needle's eye.
Des Zaunes Latten wiesen deutliche Spuren der Witterung auf.;The fence's slats showed clear traces of the weather.
Der Bodenbelag löste sich an mancher Stelle vom Grunde.;The floor covering peeled away from the base in many a place.
Ein verbeulter Napf stand vor der Hütte des Hofhundes.;A dented bowl stood before the yard dog's kennel.
Sie rieb das Zinngerät mit weichem Tuche blank.;She rubbed the pewter ware bright with a soft cloth.
Die Speisekammer war bis unter das Gebälk gefüllt.;The pantry was filled up to the beams.
Ein Stück Bindfadens hielt das Bündel notdürftig zusammen.;A piece of twine held the bundle together makeshift.
Der Kittel hing zerknittert über der Lehne des Stuhles.;The smock hung wrinkled over the back of the chair.
Sie schliff die Klinge sorgsam auf dem Schleifsteine.;She honed the blade carefully on the grindstone.
Im Weidenkorbe lagen Zwiebeln und schrumpelige Erdäpfel.;In the wicker basket lay onions and shriveled potatoes.
Des Spiegels Glas war an einer Ecke gesprungen.;The mirror's glass was cracked at one corner.
Ein muffiger Geruch nach Mottenkugeln erfüllte den Dachboden.;A musty smell of mothballs filled the attic.
Sie stellte die Milchkanne auf die kühle Steinplatte.;She placed the milk can on the cool stone slab.
Der Rost über der Glut war von Fett verkrustet.;The grate over the embers was encrusted with grease.
Auf dem Borde standen Büchsen von geschwärztem Blech.;On the shelf stood tins of blackened tin.
Ein Keil aus Hartholz stützte das schiefe Regal.;A hardwood wedge propped up the crooked shelf.
Sie wickelte das Bündel in ein Tuch von blauem Zwillich.;She wrapped the bundle in a cloth of blue ticking.
Die Schnalle des Riemens war von Rost angefressen.;The buckle of the strap was corroded by rust.
Der Ofenschieber ließ sich kaum mehr bewegen.;The stove damper could hardly be moved anymore.
Ein Hobel und etliche Feilen lagen auf der Werkbank.;A plane and several files lay on the workbench.
Sie füllte die Wärmflasche und schob sie unter das Bettzeug.;She filled the hot-water bottle and pushed it under the bedding.
Des Ofens Kacheln waren an mancher Stelle geborsten.;The stove's tiles had burst in many a place.
Auf dem Waschbrette schrubbte sie die grau gewordenen Laken.;On the washboard she scrubbed the sheets that had turned gray.
Ein schmaler Spalt klaffte zwischen Schwelle und Türe.;A narrow gap yawned between threshold and door.
Sie band die Schürze mit fester Schleife im Rücken.;She tied the apron with a firm bow at her back.
Der Griff des Kessels war mit einem Lappen umwunden.;The kettle's handle was wound about with a rag.
Im Spinde hingen die Kittel ordentlich nebeneinander.;In the locker the smocks hung neatly side by side.
Ein bröckelnder Verputz löste sich vom Kellergemäuer.;Crumbling plaster peeled away from the cellar masonry.
Sie schob den Riegel vor und löschte alsdann das Licht.;She slid the bolt shut and then extinguished the light.
Die Borsten der Bürste waren fast gänzlich abgenutzt.;The bristles of the brush were almost entirely worn down.
Auf der Fensterbank stand ein Topf mit dürrem Gewächs.;On the windowsill stood a pot with a withered plant.
Der Wischlappen hing über dem Rande des Zubers.;The rag hung over the edge of the tub.
Ein Kratzer verlief quer über die polierte Platte.;A scratch ran across the polished tabletop.
Sie hob den Deckel und rührte den Sud gemächlich um.;She lifted the lid and stirred the broth leisurely.
Des Hauses Gebälk knarrte in der Kälte der Nacht.;The house's beams creaked in the cold of the night.
Ein Napf voll Milch stand für die Katze bereit.;A bowl full of milk stood ready for the cat.
Die Zinken der Gabel waren vom Gebrauche verbogen.;The tines of the fork were bent from use.
Sie verwahrte den Schlüssel in der Lade des Schrankes.;She kept the key in the drawer of the cupboard.
Auf dem Tische lag ein Buch mit vergilbten Blättern.;On the table lay a book with yellowed leaves.
Der Gartenzaun war an mehreren Stellen niedergebrochen.;The garden fence had broken down in several places.
Ein Stapel Holzscheite lag geschichtet an der Wand.;A stack of logs lay piled against the wall.
Sie fegte den Flur mit dem alten Reisigbesen aus.;She swept out the hallway with the old twig broom.
Des Brunnens Wasser war kühl und von reinstem Geschmack.;The well's water was cool and of the purest taste.
Ein Wandbrett trug die Töpfe der eingemachten Früchte.;A wall shelf bore the pots of preserved fruits.
Die Kufen des Schlittens hatten der Rost zerfressen.;The rust had eaten away the sled's runners.
Sie goss den Rest der Brühe in eine irdene Schüssel.;She poured the rest of the broth into an earthen bowl.
Der Türklopfer aus Messing war blank gescheuert.;The brass door knocker was scoured bright.
Auf dem Boden des Kastens lagen getrocknete Kräuter.;On the bottom of the box lay dried herbs.
Ein Sieb hing an einer Kordel neben dem Ausgusse.;A sieve hung on a cord beside the drain.
Sie legte die Wäsche säuberlich in den Schrank zurück.;She laid the laundry neatly back into the cupboard.
Des Ofens Wärme währte bis in die frühen Morgenstunden.;The stove's warmth lasted into the early morning hours.
Ein Krug mit abgestoßenem Rande diente als Blumenbehälter.;A jug with a chipped rim served as a flower vessel.
Die Bohlen der Scheune waren von Wind und Wetter gezeichnet.;The barn's planks were marked by wind and weather.
Reich mir den Krug, ehe der Durst mich gänzlich übermannt.;Hand me the jug before thirst wholly overcomes me.
Verwahre den Schlüssel gut, denn ihn ersetzt uns niemand.;Keep the key well, for no one will replace it for us.
Ich bitte dich, verschließe die Pforte, sobald die Dunkelheit hereinbricht.;I beg you, lock the gate as soon as darkness falls.
Nimm den Mantel, sonst verkühlst du dich auf dem langen Wege.;Take the coat, otherwise you will catch cold on the long way.
Sage mir, wer zu dieser späten Stunde noch an die Türe pocht.;Tell me who still knocks at the door at this late hour.
Lass ab von diesem Vorhaben, ehe es dich ins Verderben stürzt.;Desist from this undertaking before it plunges you into ruin.
Ich schwöre dir bei allem, was mir teuer ist, dass ich schweigen werde.;I swear to you by all that is dear to me that I shall keep silent.
Bringe das Licht näher, denn meine Augen sind nicht mehr die besten.;Bring the light nearer, for my eyes are no longer the best.
Warte, bis der Sturm sich gelegt hat, und ziehe dann deines Weges.;Wait until the storm has abated, and then go your way.
Ich vermag dir nicht zu helfen, so leid es mir auch tut.;I am unable to help you, however sorry I may be.
Höre auf meinen Rat, denn ich habe manches Unheil kommen sehen.;Heed my counsel, for I have seen many a calamity coming.
Melde dem Herrn, dass ein Fremder um Einlass begehrt.;Announce to the master that a stranger desires admittance.
Rühre nichts an, was in dieser Kammer verwahrt liegt.;Touch nothing that lies stored in this chamber.
Ich danke dir von Herzen für die Gastfreundschaft dieser Nacht.;I thank you from the heart for this night's hospitality.
Gehe nicht fort, ehe du mir dein Wort gegeben hast.;Do not depart before you have given me your word.
Erzähle mir, was sich in jenen fernen Jahren zugetragen hat.;Tell me what came to pass in those distant years.
Wehe dem, der dieses Bündnis leichtfertig bricht.;Woe to him who lightly breaks this covenant.
Reiche mir die Hand, damit wir uns in Frieden trennen.;Give me your hand, that we may part in peace.
Ich flehe dich an, verrate mich nicht an unsere Feinde.;I implore you, do not betray me to our enemies.
Hüte dich vor jenem Manne, denn sein Wort trügt.;Beware of that man, for his word deceives.
Bereite alles vor, ehe die Gäste bei Sonnenuntergang eintreffen.;Prepare everything before the guests arrive at sunset.
Wisse, dass mein Herz dir stets gewogen bleiben wird.;Know that my heart shall ever remain favorable to you.
Führe mich zu ihm, denn ich muss ihn noch einmal sehen.;Lead me to him, for I must see him once more.
Ich entsage allem Reichtum, sofern ich nur deine Nähe behalte.;I renounce all riches, provided only that I keep your nearness.
Verzeihe mir, dass ich dein Vertrauen so schwer enttäuscht habe.;Forgive me for having so gravely disappointed your trust.
Rufe die Getreuen zusammen, ehe der Morgen graut.;Call the loyal ones together before the morning dawns.
Es geziemt sich nicht, in dieser Stunde von Freuden zu reden.;It is not fitting to speak of joys in this hour.
Nimm dieses Kleinod und gedenke meiner, wenn ich nicht mehr bin.;Take this jewel and remember me when I am no more.
Ich harre deiner Antwort, so schwer sie auch fallen mag.;I await your answer, however difficult it may be.
Schweige still, denn die Wände haben Ohren.;Be silent, for the walls have ears.
Öffne das Fenster, auf dass frische Luft hereinströme.;Open the window, that fresh air may stream in.
Ich gelobe, dieses Haus nicht eher zu verlassen, bis alles gesühnt ist.;I vow not to leave this house until all is atoned for.
Erbarme dich meiner, denn ich habe keinen anderen Zufluchtsort.;Have mercy on me, for I have no other refuge.
Sende Botschaft, sobald du wohlbehalten angekommen bist.;Send tidings as soon as you have arrived safely.
Erspare mir die Worte, deren Sinn ich längst erraten habe.;Spare me the words whose meaning I have long since guessed.
Lasse ab von deinem Zorne, ehe er dich selbst verzehrt.;Let go of your wrath before it consumes you yourself.
Bezeuge vor allen, was du mit eigenen Augen gesehen hast.;Testify before all what you have seen with your own eyes.
Ich will nichts hören, was der Wahrheit widerstreitet.;I will hear nothing that contradicts the truth.
Bewahre dieses Geheimnis, so lange du zu atmen vermagst.;Guard this secret as long as you are able to breathe.
Tritt näher, damit ich dein Antlitz deutlicher erkenne.;Step nearer, that I may discern your countenance more clearly.
Es ziemt einem Manne, sein Wort zu halten, koste es, was es wolle.;It befits a man to keep his word, cost what it may.
Bringe mir Kunde, sobald sich das Schicksal gewendet hat.;Bring me tidings as soon as fate has turned.
Ich entbiete dir meinen Gruß und wünsche dir gute Fahrt.;I offer you my greeting and wish you a good journey.
Wehre dich nicht, denn dein Widerstand ist vergebens.;Do not resist, for your resistance is in vain.
Reiche dem Gaste Speise und Trank, wie es der Brauch gebietet.;Offer the guest food and drink, as custom demands.
Ich zürne dir nicht, wiewohl du mich schwer gekränkt hast.;I bear you no wrath, even though you have grievously offended me.
Erhebe dich und folge mir, ehe die Wachen zurückkehren.;Rise and follow me before the guards return.
Sprich frei heraus, denn Verstellung hilft uns beiden nicht.;Speak freely, for dissembling helps neither of us.
Ich lege mein Schicksal vertrauensvoll in deine Hände.;I place my fate trustingly in your hands.
Verweile noch ein wenig, ehe die Trennung uns ereilt.;Linger yet a while before parting overtakes us.
Nimm dich in Acht, denn der Weg durch den Wald ist unsicher.;Take heed, for the way through the forest is unsafe.
Ich fordere Genugtuung für die Schmach, die man mir angetan hat.;I demand satisfaction for the disgrace done to me.
Trage diese Botschaft zum Könige, und säume nicht dabei.;Carry this message to the king, and do not tarry.
Vergib, dass ich dich zu so später Stunde störe.;Forgive me for disturbing you at such a late hour.
Lasse uns Frieden schließen, ehe noch mehr Blut vergossen wird.;Let us make peace before more blood is shed.
Ich bedarf deines Beistandes, so schwer die Bitte mir auch fällt.;I need your assistance, however hard the request comes to me.
Halte inne und bedenke, was du soeben zu tun im Begriff stehst.;Halt and consider what you are about to do.
Ich will nicht länger warten, denn die Zeit drängt unerbittlich.;I will wait no longer, for time presses inexorably.
Bekenne dich zu deiner Schuld, und man wird dir gnädig sein.;Confess your guilt, and you shall be shown mercy.
Führe mich hinaus ins Freie, denn diese Mauern erdrücken mich.;Lead me out into the open, for these walls oppress me.
Bewache das Tor, bis der Morgen anbricht.;Guard the gate until morning breaks.
Ich hoffe inständig, dass wir uns dereinst wiedersehen.;I fervently hope that we shall see each other again one day.
Vernimm, was ich dir zu sagen habe, ehe es zu spät ist.;Hear what I have to say to you before it is too late.
Es steht mir nicht zu, über dein Handeln zu urteilen.;It is not for me to judge your conduct.
Löse den Riegel, damit der Bote eintreten kann.;Loosen the bolt, so that the messenger may enter.
Ich entsinne mich noch wohl des Tages, da wir uns begegneten.;I still remember well the day on which we met.
Schone deiner Kräfte, denn die Reise ist beschwerlich.;Spare your strength, for the journey is arduous.
Verkünde allem Volke, dass die Fehde beendet sei.;Proclaim to all the people that the feud is ended.
Wende dich ab, wenn dir der Anblick zu schwer wird.;Turn away if the sight becomes too much for you.
Ich bürge mit meinem Leben für die Treue dieses Mannes.;I vouch with my life for this man's fidelity.
Zögere nicht länger, sonst entrinnt uns die Gelegenheit.;Hesitate no longer, or the opportunity will escape us.
Neige dein Ohr zu mir, denn meine Stimme versagt.;Incline your ear to me, for my voice is failing.
Es sei dir vergeben, wiewohl der Schmerz noch lange währt.;Be forgiven, though the pain shall endure long.
Reise wohl, und möge dich kein Unheil ereilen.;Travel well, and may no calamity befall you.
Ich weiche nicht von dieser Stelle, ehe du mir geantwortet hast.;I shall not budge from this spot before you have answered me.
Bezähme deine Zunge, ehe sie dir Verderben bringt.;Curb your tongue before it brings you ruin.
Erhöre meine Bitte, so du noch ein Herz im Leibe hast.;Grant my request, if you still have a heart in your body.
Nimm Platz und laß uns bereden, was zu tun bleibt.;Take a seat and let us discuss what remains to be done.
Ich schwöre Rache jenem, der uns dies angetan hat.;I swear vengeance upon him who has done this to us.
Bringe Wasser herbei, denn der Verwundete verschmachtet.;Bring water, for the wounded man is languishing.
So sei es denn, wie du es bestimmt hast.;So be it, then, as you have determined.
Hebe den Blick, denn Scham steht dir nicht an.;Raise your gaze, for shame does not become you.
Ich lasse dich ungern ziehen, doch halte ich dich nicht.;I let you go reluctantly, yet I do not hold you back.
Gedenke der Deinen, wenn du in der Fremde weilst.;Remember your own when you dwell in foreign lands.
